<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891205-0017 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.12-05-89.f2.A1016</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 230 / Friday, December 1, 1989/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Secretary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">49 CFR Part 40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 45928; Notice No. 2]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 2105-AB42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Procedures for Transportation Workplace Drug Testing Programs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of the Secretary, DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Department of Transportation is adopting a finalrule concerning testing procedures applicable to drug testing programsthe Department requires in six transportation industries. The final ruleincorporates modifications in response to comments on the Department'sNovember 21, 1988, interim final rule on the same subject.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATES: </T2>This rule is effective January 2, 1990, exceptthat andSection; 40.31(d) is effective May 30, 1990 for employers with fewerthan 2000 covered employees. Compliance with all portions of this ruleis authorized immediately.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Robert C. Ashby, Deputy AssistantGeneral Counsel for Regulation and Enforcement, Department of Transportation,400 7th Street, SW., Room 10424, Washington, DC 20590, (202-366-9306).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>On November 21, 1988 (53 FR 47002),the Department published an interim final rule establishing drug testingprocedures applicable to drug testing for transportation employees undersix Department of Transportation regulations. These six regulations werepublished on that same date by the Federal Aviation Administration, FederalHighway Administration, Federal Railroad Administration, United StatesCoast Guard, Urban Mass Transportation Administration, and Research andSpecial Programs Administration. The interim final rule (49 CFR part 40)followed closely the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) regulationentitled ``Mandatory Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs.''The ``DHHS Guidelines,'' as this document is known, were published in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> on April 11, 1988 (53 FR 11970). They were basedon a notice of proposed rulemaking (NPRM) published August 14, 1987, byDHHS, and on comments to that NPRM. The DHHS Guidelines include proceduresfor collecting urine samples for drug testing, procedures for transmittingthe samples to testing laboratories, testing procedures, procedures forevaluating test results, quality control measures applicable to the laboratories,recordkeeping and reporting requirements, and standards and proceduresfor DHHS certification of drug testing laboratories. The intent of theGuidelines is to safeguard the accuracy and integrity of test results andthe privacy of individuals who are tested. The interim final rule modifiedsome provisions of the DHHS Guidelines in order to adapt the Guidelinesto the circumstances of transportation industries.DHHS has informed DOT that, beginning with a November 29-December 1, 1989,conference, it is engaging in a consensus process concerning its testingguidelines and laboratory certification procedures. This effort will includeconsideration of many of the issues raised in this rulemaking. DOT willparticipate in this process. Should revisions in the DHHS Guidelines resultfrom this process, DOT could initiate rulemaking to make this Part consistentwith those changes. This does not mean that we have plans to change theserules but, rather, that they are not static, and that we intend to keepup with the state of the art in testing procedures.The Department received over 80 comments on the interim final rule itself.In addition, the Department has incorporated into the docket for the interimfinal rule and reviewed comments on the NPRMs for the six operating administrationdrug testing rules that pertain to the DHHS Guidelines and testing procedureissues. This final rule and preamble respond to all these comments.<ITAG tagnum="84">Response to Comments</ITAG>1. Testing for Additional DrugsThe interim final rule requires employers to test for five drugs: marijuana,cocaine, opiates, amphetamines, and phencyclidine (PCP). Generally speaking,if employers wish to test for drugs other than these five, the interimfinal rule requires them to take a second, separate sample for this purpose.The ``DOT sample'' may not be used for this or other purposes.A number of comments objected to this provision, noting that other substances(e.g., barbiturates, benzodiazapines, alcohol) are abused and can causesafety problems. Some comments said that employers were already testingfor these additional substances (often stating that they tested for nineor ten drugs currently), and that the rule would either make them scaleback existing programs or increase their testing costs. Under the approachthat most of these comments appeared to favor, an employer, where its authorityto do so was not otherwise constrained (e.g., by state law or union contract),could ask the laboratory to test the ``DOT sample'' for any additionalsubstances the employer chose.When the Federal government requires an employer to conduct drug tests,it seems clear from court decisions that the fourth amendment applies tothe testing that the employer conducts in response to the Federal requirement.Fourth amendment considerations would arguably apply to any testing resultingfrom a urine sample collection required by the Federal government, includingdiscretionary employer testing piggybacked onto the DOT-mandated collection.The employers' discretionary testing would also probably be reviewed bythe courts as part of the courts' consideration of the overall validityof DOT drug testing rules.In determining whether a testing requirement passes fourth amendment muster,courts typically have tried to balance governmental interests underlyingthe testing requirement and the privacy interests of employees. One ofthe factors examined by the courts in determining the strength of the governmentalinterest is the safety necessity of testing. Another factor examined isthe extent to which testing procedures protect the privacy interest ofemployees, thereby limiting the intrusion on rights protected by the fourthamendment.Courts have upheld Federally-mandated drug testing for the five drugs underthe DHHS Guidelines (see for instance <T3>Skinner</T3> v. <T3>Railway Labor Executives Association Skinner,</T3> 109 S.Ct. 1402 (1989)).Testing for additional drugs increases the privacy intrusion of testing.Therefore, a change in this respect may make court approval of DOT-requiredtesting more difficult.DHHS-approved testing protocols and positive thresholds for drugs beyondthe five for which testing is now required do not exist. DHHS certificationof laboratories does not extend to testing of any of the additional drugs.Consequently, the uniform standards crucial to the accuracy and integrityof the testing process, which courts have relied upon in upholding Federally-requireddrug testing, are not now in place for the additional drugs. This absenceof uniform standards could also make defense of the DOT regulations incourt more difficult.There are also unresolved practical problems that could result from DOTpermitting employers to use the ``DOT sample'' to test for additional drugs.Many of the additional substances commenters expressed a desire to testfor are widely available as prescription drugs (e.g., barbiturates). TheMedical Review Officer's task in determining whether the drug use indicatedby the test is legitimate (and hence not a verified positive) is likelyto be significantly more difficult in dealing with legal prescription drugs.The use of DOT-mandated tests to discover the presence of a variety oflegal prescription drugs, and therefore to permit employer inferences aboutotherwise confidential medical conditions, could not easily be prevented.For these reasons, the Department believes that it is inadvisable, at thistime, to grant employers the discretion to test the ``DOT sample'' foradditional drugs. As under the interim final rule, employers wishing totest for substances other than the five drugs for which testing is mandatorymust do so using a second, separate sample. This means, in practice, thatthe employer would have to direct an employee to go to the collection site,do the DOT collection (including providing the sample and completing thepaperwork), and then (either at that time or a subsequent time) returnto the collection site and provide the ``employer sample.'' In no case,under DOT regulations, would it be proper for the employer to direct theemployee to fill one container and then pour off the urine into separate``DOT'' and ``employer'' collections. Nor would it be appropriate for theemployer to retain any ``surplus'' urine in excess of the 60 ml ``DOT sample''to be used for the employer's purposes. These approaches would use theDOT-mandated collection to acquire urine to be used to test for additionaldrugs or for other purposes, and would raise the whole set of concernsthat lie behind the Department's decision on the additional drugs issue.At the same time, the Department is well aware of the costs and administrativeburdens implicit in the ``second, separate sample'' approach. The concernsof employers who wish to test employees for other drugs which may impairsafety are legitimate. Consequently, the Department will consider additionalrulemaking to deal with all aspects of this problem. Such a rulemakingwould be intended to explore means of responding to employers' concernsthat would avoid or mitigate the problems we see with permitting employersto test for additional drugs, including the identification of appropriateadditional drugs for which testing is warranted and the establishment ofappropriate testing protocols for those drugs. The Department will alsocontinue its contacts with DHHS and the Department of Justice in an attemptto determine if a resolution of this problem can be reached that can overcomecurrent practical and legal obstacles.2. Laboratory Issuesa. <T3>Use of laboratories not certified by DHHS.</T3> Comments suggestedthat the requirement to use only laboratories certified by DHHS be eliminated.In the alternative, comments suggested that laboratories certified fordrug testing by the College of American Pathologists (CAP) or other recognizedstate or private certifying agencies could also be used, at least in somecircumstances (e.g., screening tests, tests at remote sites), if not acrossthe board. Comments cited the cost of the DHHS certification process anda concern about the available capacity of DHHS-certified labs as reasonsfor this request, as well as asserting that other certification programs(e.g. that operated by CAP) were equivalent to the DHHS system. In addition,comments mentioned satisfactory, existing relationships between labs andemployers, which neither wanted to sever. Some comments asked for a transitionmechanism to permit labs to complete the DHHS certification process withouthaving to sever existing relationships with transportation employers.The Department continues to believe that the DHHS certification mechanismis the best guarantee of error-free drug testing available. Its requirementsare more stringent, and its inspection and quality control measures morethorough, than any other existing certification mechanism. This not tosay that other certification systems, such as that of the CAP, are necessarilyinadequate, only that in a program dependent for its success on the unerringaccuracy of lab work, the Department is justified in insisting on the highestavailable standards. These standards have been recognized in court casesupholding Federal drug testing programs. To the extent, in the future,that other certification programs are recognized as equivalent by DHHS,to whose expertise the Department gives substantial deference, the Departmentcan consider at that time permitting laboratories certified under thoseprograms to participate.At present, DHHS has certified 37 laboratories, which DHHS estimates tohave an annual capacity of over 20 million tests. DHHS expects to certifya number of additional laboratories by year's end. This should providecapacity well in excess of that needed for all testing required under DOTrules (which by 1991, is projected to result in 3-6 million tests per year).We recognize that some laboratories that currently conduct drug testingfor transportation companies may choose not to seek DHHS certification,for reasons including costs. Such laboratories could lose some existingbusiness. However, the Department believes that this situation does notwarrant eliminating the requirement for DHHS certification, which wouldhave serious adverse consequences for the Department's entire drug testingeffort.b. <T3>On-site testing.</T3> Some employers, particularly in the maritimeindustry, asked that the rules allow on-site testing. That is, rather thansending the initial screen test to a DHHS-approved lab for analysis, theemployer would use a screen test, the result of which could be read atthe collections site. If the screen test were negative, the individualwould start or continue to work. If it were positive, the individual wouldbe kept from working in a safety-sensitive position until and unless alaboratory or MRO declared the test negative. (Some employers said theywould continue to pay an employee in the interim.) The advantages claimedfor this approach are that it allows a quick turnaround of results, ishelpful in avoiding disruptions in operations, and that it reduces thelikelihood of drug users actually performing safety-sensitive functions.In the Department's view, these claimed advantages are outweighed by theproblems involved with on-site testing. With on-site testing, particularlyif testing technicians have not been extensively trained, error rates arelikely to be considerably higher than for tests conducted in DHHS-approvedlaboratories. These error rates include substantially more false negativesas well as more false positives, meaning that on-site testing could resultin inadvertently allowing drug users to work in safety-sensitive jobs (sincenegatives would not be sent for confirmation tests). The protection foremployees afforded by use of a DHHS-certified lab (indeed, any lab at all)is wholly absent at the screening test level. Nor have the comments' assertionspersuaded the Department that unreasonable costs or delays will resultfrom using DHHS-certified laboratories for testing.With on-site testing, an employee or applicant may be deprived of an opportunityto work and may be stigmatized as a drug user based on a less accuratetype of test with fewer protections. For an employer to promise back pay,or continuing pay, to an employee while a confirmation is pending is welland good, but it is not a complete answer. It does not deal with the veryreal career impact of even a temporary identification of someone as a druguser and (especially in the quick turnaround situations emphasized by maritimecommenters) does not address the lost job opportunities of applicants.The Department must balance the sometimes competing, legitimate interestsof both the employers and the employees its rules affect. By allowing on-sitetesting, we would shift the balance too far away from the employees' concerns.Like other testing procedure issues, on-site testing is likely to be discussedin the DHHS consensus process.c. <T3>Other comments.</T3> One comment suggested that DOT or the labs themselvesshould notify their DOT-regulated clients if DHHS suspends or terminatestheir certification. We believe that it is not necessary to make this suggestiona regulatory requirement. However, in the event that a laboratory doeslose its certification, we believe that the laboratory should notify itsclients of the fact. Should laboratories fail to do so, the Departmentcan consider, at a future time, adding a regulatory provision to this effect.Comments suggested that all employers should be required to conduct laboratoryinspections, either directly or through a neutral third party. We believethat adding such a requirement is unnecessary, in light of the extensiveDHHS certification process. It would also be unduly burdensome, not onlyto employers (especially to small employers) but also to laboratories,whose operations could be disrupted by ``inspectors'' representing hundredsof employers walking through their facilities.One comment suggested two levels of certification; one for performing screeningtests and the other for performing confirmation tests. This comment dovetailswith comments suggesting that a local laboratory should be allowed to performthe screening test and then send positive screens to a DHHS-approved labfor certification. On the other hand, another comment suggested that nosubcontracting be allowed. In the Department's view, the existing provision(all testing of a particular specimen must be done within a single DHHS-approvedlab, but one DHHS-lab can subcontract a portion of an employer's testingcontract to another DHHS-certified facility) remains a good middle groundamong these positions. The existing rule maintains laboratory quality andaccuracy by insisting on full DHHS certification, and avoids chain of custodycomplications by requiring all work on a specimen to take place withinone lab facility. At the same time, it permits some flexibility for employerswho may wish a ``master contract'' with one lab but who find it convenientto have samples processed in various parts of the country.One comment suggested authorizing union participation in laboratory inspections.The Department believes that union participation in the inspection processis best left to the collective bargaining process. Where labor and managementagree to include representatives of both in an inspection, nothing in theregulation would stand in the way.3. Blind TestingThe interim final rule required blind testing at the levels specified inthe DHHS guidelines (a number equivalent to 50 percent of tests submittedin the first 90 days, up to 500; ten percent of samples in each succeedingquarter, up to 250) for all employers who would submit 1000 samples ormore a year. Employers who would submit fewer than 1000 samples per yearwould not have to submit blind samples, if they used a laboratory to whichsomeone else (e.g., a Federal agency, another DOT-regulated employer) submittedblind samples.A substantial number of comments, citing what they viewed as the troubleand high expense of submitting blind samples, said that employers shouldnever have to submit these samples. It was sufficient, in this view, torely on the DHHS certification process. Other commenters suggested reducingthe number of blind samples submitted, either by using a lower percentage(e.g., between one and five percent) or a small absolute number of specimens(e.g., between two and eight per quarter). Still other comments, to thecontrary, suggested that all employers should submit blind samples, lestlaboratories treat samples from a particular employer with less care becausethat employer is known not to submit blind samples.The Department believes that blind sampling is an important quality controlmeasure. Blind testing does not duplicate DHHS certification measures;it is over and above those measures. In addition to its function as a qualitycontrol technique to make sure that labs stay sharp, it tests the entirecollection process. Consequently, while the Department is aware of thecost implications of blind testing, we do not believe that it would bea good idea to eliminate the requirement that employers submit blind samples.(It should be noted that blind sample costs appear to be getting lower,with a number of suppliers having informed DHHS that they plan to providesamples for between $10 and $20 each.)However, after consulting with DHHS, we believe that the quality controlobjectives of blind testing can be achieved with fewer blind samples. Moreover,we believe that the administration of blind sampling can be simplifiedby dropping the two-tier (first vs. subsequent quarters) approach of theinterim final rule and by expressing the blind sampling rate as three blindsamples per 100 employee specimens, rather than as a percentage. This meansthat, over whatever period of time it takes for an employer to submit 100employee specimens (whether a week or a number of years), the employerwould submit three blind samples.An employer would not have to submit more than 100 blind samples in anycalendar quarter. This is a high maximum; an employer would have to besubmitting over 3300 employee specimens in a quarter to reach this level.A DOT agency could raise the maximum in a case when a party (e.g., a verylarge consortium having several major employers as members) would submitan unusually large number of specimens. This authority would be used onlyrarely, in all likelihood.With respect to smaller employers, the Department remains reluctant toimpose additional financial burdens. Nevertheless, we believe that thereis merit in the contention that the knowledge that even small employerswill submit some blind samples is an important quality control measurethat will deter potential carelessness on the part of laboratories andhelp employers discover problems in the processing of samples. Consequently,the Department will require all employers to submit blind samples at thethree per 100 specimen rate. In submitting blind samples, smaller employers(those with fewer than 2000 covered employees) could submit all blanksor submit two separately labeled portions of a specimen from the same non-coveredemployee to make sure that the analyses were the same. These approacheswould allow smaller employers to minimize costs. In addition, since employerswith fewer than 2000 employees who are scheduled to begin testing in December1989 or early 1990 will have had short notice of having to do blind testing,these blind testing requirements will not go into effect for them until180 days from the date this rule is published. This ``grace period'' willallow these employers time to make arrangements for blind testing.   When a consortium submits blind samples, it does so collectively on behalfof all its members. The individual members would not need to submit anyblind samples independently. The consortium would submit three blind samplesfor every 100 samples it submitted on the collective behalf of its members.  4. Positive Levels   Several comments requested that the regulation provide more stringent positivelevels for one or more drugs. Marijuana was the drug most often mentionedin this connection. There were a number of suggestions for a screen positivelevel of 20 nanograms per milliliter (ng/ml), with a confirmation levelof 10 ng/ml. (The interim final rule called for 100 and 15 ng/ml for screenand confirmation levels, respectively). Other suggestions included loweringthe amphetamines screen and confirmation levels from 1000 and 500 ng/ml,respectively, to 500 and 300 ng/ml. One comment suggested a 150 ng/ml screenlevel for cocaine (the interim final rule established 300 ng/ml for thispurpose). The argument, essentially, is that by tightening cutoff levels,especially at the screen test level, more persons using drugs would becaught.   As the comments indicate, there are a variety of preferences on the subjectof positive levels. After consulting with DHHS, we believe that the existingpositive levels best achieve a reasonable balance between the objectivesof treating as positive significant amounts of drug metabolites in an employee'ssystem while treating as negatives smaller quantities of metabolites thatcould result from such sources as passive inhalation, cross-reactivity,or ingestion of food products. Tightening positive thresholds, especiallyat the screen test stage, would probably increase program costs, as therewould probably be a higher number of initial tests requiring confirmation(and a lower percentage of screen positives that confirmed positive). DHHSis likely to consider this issue in its consensus process on guidelineissues, and the Department can revisit the issue following this DHHS consideration.  5. Observed Tests   This issue pertains to the circumstances, if any, under which direct observationof an employee providing a urine sample is permitted or required. Sincedirect observation makes the collection process more intrusive, the interimfinal rule limited direct observation to four circumstances in which thereis reason to believe that a particular employee may tamper with the specimen.  Some comments requested that this limitation be relaxed or eliminated,allowing greater discretion for observed collections. The Department didnot adopt this suggestion, in the view that existing safeguards in part40 are adequate to prevent tampering and that direct observation, becauseof its increased intrusiveness, should be strictly limited. Limitationson direct observation are one factor in the balance between privacy andsafety necessity considered by the courts.   Other comments opposed all direct observation. The Department did not adoptthis comment either, believing that where, for example, there is strongevidence of tampering, direct observation is needed to ensure the integrityof the collection process. Some comments specifically opposed direct observationas part of follow-up (i.e., post-positive) testing, while other commentersfavored this practice. The Department believes that direct observationmay be a useful tool in follow-up testing. For example, some kinds of druguse (e.g., cocaine addiction) may be very difficult to treat; substanceabuse experts suggest that many people undergoing rehabilitation sufferrelapses of cocaine use. An individual who has returned to work after rehabilitationbut has suffered such a relapse may have a greater incentive to attemptto beat a follow-up test, because the employer may not provide a secondopportunity for rehabilitation. If the employer or EAP counselor believesthat this may be the case, the opportunity for direct observation shouldexist.   In this connection, it should be pointed out that, under the regulation,direct observation is mandatory only when the collection site person observesbehavior clearly indicating an attempt to tamper or when the specimen temperatureis outside the normal temperature range and an oral body temperature readingis refused or is inconsistent with the specimen temperature. In follow-uptesting and when the specific gravity and createnine content of a previoussample are below the regulatory standards, the employer has discretionto require direct observation.Other comments suggested that the MRO should determine when a collectionshould be directly observed. While, in some situations, the MRO may beinvolved in this determination (and a company may use an MRO for this purpose),the Department does not think it would be a good idea to mandate this involvement.For example, MROs often may not be located near the testing site, makingtheir mandatory involvement impractical.Some comments opposed, and others favored, the current requirement thata higher-level supervisor of the collection site person, or a designatedemployer representative, concur with a decision of the collection siteperson to require direct observation. The Department believes that thisrequirement of the current rule is sound, as a check on the decision ofa staff person to require an intrusion on privacy, and should be retained.One comment suggested that a directly observed collection could be madeif either creatinine levels or specific gravity on previous test (ratherthan both, as under the current rule) were below the regulatory standard.In the Department's view, it is preferable to retain the current provision.Given the additional privacy intrusion involved in a directly observedcollection, it is preferable to have two, rather than one, indicators ofpossible dilution of a sample before proceeding to an observed collection.6. Testing Procedure Issuesa. <T3>Collection site person issues.</T3> Some commenters requested thatthe Department establish training procedures or standards, or establishtesting requirements, for collection site personnel. The Department doesnot believe such requirements are necessary. The interim final rule providesthat, if not a licensed medical professional or technician, a collectionsite person must be trained for his or her function. This training is intendedto be training to proficiency (i.e., the person must be trained sufficientlyto ensure that he or she will perform the functions of the job competently).We would also point out the existing requirement for the provision of instructionsto collection site personnel.The Department does not believe that it would be productive to requireall collection site persons to conform to a single training curriculumdeveloped by the Department. If there is sufficient interest (expressed,for example, at forthcoming DOT drug conferences or in correspondence tothe Department), the Department could consider cooperating in the developmentof a model training module. More extensive requirements, such as testingor certification, are likely to be unduly costly. Such requirements couldalso interfere with reasonable cause or post-accident tests, which sometimesmust be conducted at medical facilities that are not regular collectionsites.One comment suggested that supervisors of employees should not be permittedto collect specimens from the employees. The concern of the commenter appearedto be that a supervisor might have the appearance of a conflict of interestin collecting a specimen from an employee the supervisor did not like.The Department agrees that it would be preferable, as a general matter,for supervisors not to collect specimens from their own subordinates. Consequently,we have altered the rule to provide that the direct supervisor of a coveredemployee may not act as the collection site person for that employee, exceptwhere this is impracticable (e.g., on a ship at sea, where the only personor persons available and qualified to do collections have a supervisoryrelationship with the employees). If individual DOT agency rules imposemore stringent provisions, the more stringent requirements apply.One comment asked that the employer's own personnel be permitted to conductcollections. The current rule permits this practice. With the exceptionstated above concerning direct supervisors, the Department will permitthis practice to continue. It was also suggested that collection site personnelcan be licensed by any state or jurisdiction. Again, this is already thecase (and for MROs as well as medical professionals or technicians whocollect specimens).A number of comments suggested that the collection site person should beable to be of the opposite gender from the employee, when a same-sex personis not available. Under the current rule, a collection site person mustbe of the same gender as the employee in only two circumstances. One isthat the individual who watches an employee provide a directly observedsample must be of the same gender as the employee. It should be pointedout that only the observer (who does not need special training) must beof the same gender as the employee. An opposite gender collection siteperson could still perform other collection functions, as long as a same-genderobserver were used.The second case involves and individual who ``monitors'' a collection.Such an individual, if he or she is not a medical professional or technician,must be of the same gender as the donor. A collection site person ``monitors''a collection, for this purpose, only if he or she is in close proximityto the employee as the employee provides the sample, such that the collectionsite person can hear the employee's actions. For example, if the collectiontakes place in a public rest room, in which the employee goes into a partiallypartitioned stall to provide the sample, while the collection site personremains in the common area of the rest room, the collection site personwould be ``monitoring'' the collection. On the other hand, if the collectiontakes place in a facility (like many medical facilities) in which the employeegoes into a separate room, with a fully closable door, to donate the sample,while the collection site person remains outside, ``monitoring'' wouldnot take place. In the former case, the person monitoring the collectionwould have to be either a medical professional or technician (of eithergender) or someone without medical training who is of the same gender asthe employee.The Department believes that these requirements are important to safeguardemployees' privacy. While we understand that there may be occasional situationsin which the requirements make it difficult or more costly to conduct collections,we believe that, on balance, the privacy interests of employees justifythese costs.Another comment suggested that the collection site person should not bepermitted to leave the collection site before the specimen is sealed andlabeled. This requirement is already part of the regulation and will beretained. It was also suggested that, to increase efficiency, a collectionsite person could work with more than one donor at a time, with appropriatesafeguards. The current rule limits the collection site person to workingon one specimen at a time ``in order to promote security of the specimens,avoid distraction of the collection site person and ensure against anyconfusion in the identity of specimens'' (49 CFR 40.25(d)). These reasonsremain valid, and the Department is retaining this requirement. This provisiondoes not preclude more than one collection site person from working ina particular collection site, however, as long as each person supervisesonly one donor at a time.b. <T3>Sample Quantity.</T3> Comments mentioned the ``shy bladder'' problem,in which an individual, for physiological or psychological reasons, isunable to produce sufficient urine for a sample. The Department does notbelieve it would be consistent with the intent of the testing program toexcuse from testing persons solely on the basis that they claimed to havethis problem or who, on a first attempt, were unable to produce a specimen.In its internal program, the Department, consistent with the DHHS Guidelines,tells the individual to drink additional fluid and wait a reasonable timebefore trying again to produce a sample. During this time, the individualremains at the collection site or otherwise under supervision. If, aftera reasonable time, the individual cannot provide the sample, the individualis scheduled for a subsequent unannounced test. If the result is the same,the individual would be directed to see a physician, whose evaluation ofwhether there was a genuine problem or a refusal to take a test would beprovided to the employer. The rule adopts a similar system, with refinementstaking into account the differences among different types of testing.Some comments also suggested, as a general matter, that a sample smallerthan 60 ml (e.g., 30 ml) would be adequate. The purpose of a 60 ml sampleis to allow sufficient urine for multiple GCMS confirmation tests (if thescreen test is positive for multiple drugs) and for a retest, if one isrequested. While a smaller quantity may be sufficient in many cases, the60 ml sample size leaves a greater margin of safety for situations in whichmultiple aliquots are needed. (We would suggest, however, that if a samplereaching the laboratory inadvertently is a small amount short of the 60ml, the test need not necessarily be cancelled. The test should be cancelledonly if the amount of urine proved insufficient for all necessary analysis(including a reserve of 10 ml for possible retesting).)A comment also suggested that female employees be excused from testingduring their menstrual periods. The Department does not believe that thisis essential, either for the integrity of the testing process or the comfortof employees. We recommend that when an employee states to the collectionsite person that the two events coincide, the collection site person shouldnote the fact on the chain of custody form. If any substances (e.g., blood)or other chemical changes in the urine made a valid test impossible, thelaboratory would cancel the test.c. <T3>Additional protections for employees</T3>_Some comments urged a requirementfor ``split samples.'' That is, the employee would provide a sample whichwould be divided into two containers. The two containers would be separatelylabeled. One would be sent to the laboratory for analysis while the otherwould be stored (either at the same lab, a second lab, or an employer storagesite). If the first sample were positive, the second sample would be tested.If the second result were negative, the test would be cancelled. The commentsuggested that this system would provide an extra measure of protectionfor employees against employer or laboratory error.The Department does not believe that split samples should be required aspart of this regulation. Given the stringent safeguards embodied in theseprocedures (e.g., concerning collection, chain of custody, DHHS-approvedlabs, GCMS confirmation tests, and MRO verification), the likelihood ofa false positive is extremely low. (For example, the Department, in over30,000 tests run under the DHHS Guidelines, has never had a false positive.)The extra costs and administrative burden of a split sample system wouldbe unlikely to provide significant additional, necessary protection foremployees. If employers wish to use a ``split sample'' approach, however,the rule permits them to do so. It should be emphasized that doing so iscompletely voluntary; at the same time, the Department sees no compellingreason to prohibit the practice.The Department is adopting another suggestion to increase employee confidencein the process. This comment is to require the employee to be providedwith a prepackaged specimen bottle (and collection container, if applicable)prior to providing the sample. We recommend, in addition, that the collectionsite person shall allow the employee to select the specimen bottle andcollection container he or she will use.The Department has not adopted a suggestion for having DOT-establishedquality assurance guidelines. This matter is adequately handled by theDHHS certification process and blind testing requirements. A related suggestion,to allow employees who test positive access to all laboratory records,is adequately handled by the existing rule (see andSection; 40.37).Among other suggestions the Department is not adopting are to have an employeerepresentative required to be present with the tested employee at the collectionsite (which potentially would cause crowding, delay, and interference withthe process), to give employees an hour after coming off the job beforetaking a random test (which would cause unnecessary delay and expense),to prohibit tests during rest periods (which would needlessly complicatethe timing of the testing process and make it more expensive), and to establisha separate positive threshold for retests of positive specimens (a retestis simply for the presence of the drug, making this step unnecessary).The Department agrees with comments suggesting that needed medical treatmentshould not be delayed in order to collect a specimen and the rule so provides.d. <T3>Other issues</T3>_A comment suggested requiring a permanent collectionsite logbook. The DHHS Guidelines contain this requirement; the DOT proceduresdeleted the requirement as an unnecessary administrative burden in lightof the chain of custody form called for in the rule. The Department continuesto believe that the rule's chain of custody form system is adequate (oneof the copies of the form is retained by the collector) for records purposesand that a permanent log book would be duplicative.Another suggestion was to make the collection procedures of section 40.25voluntary instead of mandatory. The Department did not adopt this comment,because doing so could result in inconsistent and potentially inadequateprotections for the integrity and accuracy of the collection process.It was suggested, with reference to andSection; 40.25(f)(16), that it wasunnecessary to send to the lab both a suspect sample and a retest sample.Since it is possible that the initial specimen could be valid, we believethat it makes sense to send both.A comment objected to ever using public bathrooms, contending that theirsecurity could not be assured. When a public bathroom is used, it mustbe posted against access by persons not involved in the drug testing processand access must be controlled by the collection site person. These existingsafeguards are sufficient, in the Department's view.It was also suggested that collection site persons show an ID to the employeeupon request and provide a receipt for personal belongings surrenderedby the employee. We believe it is fair that, since the employee must showID to the collection site person, the collection site person would reciprocateif asked. If surrendered personal belongings do not remain in the sameroom with the collection site person and the employee, we also believeit is reasonable for a receipt to be provided. The rule has been amendedto provide for both these safeguards.It was suggested that an employee not have to wash his or her hands priorto giving the sample. Because it is possible to conceal adulterants undera fingernail, we believe this practice should continue. We agree with acomment that it is preferable to store specimens in a secured area (e.g.,a locked refrigerator) prior to shipment, and we recommend this practice,but we do not think it necessary to require this practice in the rule.The rule's safeguards for specimen security are sufficient, in our view,and not every location where samples are taken may have something likea locked refrigerator (e.g., remote work sites). Nor do we believe it isnecessary to record the specimen temperature in every case; recording normaltemperature results would simply be additional paperwork not adding tothe integrity of the process.7. Medical Review Officer Issuesa. <T3>Who performs MRO functions?</T3>_A number of comments said, in effect,that no one should have to perform MRO functions, since the concept ofan MRO was an impediment to the efficient functioning of a drug testingprogram and that the MRO should be deleted from the rule. The Departmentcontinues to believe that having an MRO is crucial to a good drug testingprogram. The Department's program is intended to deter and detect the prohibiteduse of certain types of drugs, in the interest of transportation safety.Many substances (e.g., opiates, cocaine) have legitimate medical uses aswell as prohibited uses. Laboratory machines, however accurate, cannotmake this distinction; they just measure quantities of a chemical in urine.A trained, medically knowledgeable person_the MRO_is essential to be ableto distinguish licit from prohibited use of substances. In the absenceof such informed medical judgment, we believe that the system would beless likely to achieve its objective and would be very unfair. Like a soundchain of custody, GCMS-confirmed tests, and DHHS-certified labs, havingan MRO is a safeguard that the DOT program cannot do without.Some comments suggested that a staff member of a testing laboratory shouldbe able to function as the MRO. Since laboratories may have qualified physicianson their staffs, this could be both a convenience for the many employerswho do not have staff physicians of their own and a useful marketing toolfor laboratories. However, the Department is concerned that there couldbe a conflict of interest, or the appearance of such a conflict, betweena doctor's role as a staff member of a laboratory and the MRO's responsibilityto determine whether test results are scientifically sufficient. To dealwith this problem, the Department is amending the regulation to providethat if a laboratory wants to provide MRO services, it must establish aseparation of functions to guard against the possibility of a conflictof interest. For example, the laboratory could spin off an organizationallyseparate subsidiary to perform MRO functions or could erect what is sometimescalled a ``bubble'' or ``Chinese wall'' around the MRO, to ensure thatthe MRO is not subject to communications or influences that could createthe appearance or reality of a conflict of interest. In no case could thephysicians performing as MROs have responsibility for, or be subject tothe supervision of those who have responsibility for, the drug testingor quality control operations of the laboratory.Comments also suggested that MROs should be able to have non-physicianson their staffs who would take care of administrative duties, making contactswith employees, etc. The current rule does not prohibit this practice,and an amendment is not needed for this purpose. MROs are likely to needstaff persons for administrative duties, and these staff may certainlymake the initial contacts with employees (e.g., place calls to those whohave tested positive to inform them that the MRO needs to talk to them).An appropriately medically trained staff person (e.g., a nurse with substanceabuse training) may gather information from an employee about the employee'sexplanation for a positive result. In every case, however, the MRO mustmake the decision about whether, and talk to the employee before, a confirmedlaboratory positive is verified positive. No staff person can make thisdecision for the MRO. All persons working for the MRO are bound by thesame requirements for confidentiality to which the MRO is subject.Comments disagreed on whether non-physicians could serve as MROs. The Departmentbelieves that it is important for the MRO to be a physician, in order thata person with substantial medical training be in a position to make thecritical medical judgment about whether an individual's drug use is legitimate.b. <T3>Which tests does the MRO review?_</T3>Some commenters thought MROsshould not have to review negative tests. The current regulation, whilerequiring negatives to be sent from the lab to the MRO, does not requiresubstantive review of negatives by the MRO. The MRO's function with respectto negatives need be only an administrative one, and ought not add significantcosts to the process, since only administrative processing fees (as distinctfrom fees for professional medical services) would seem to be involved.The rule now explicitly states this point.This administrative role is an important one, however. If negatives weresent directly to the employer from the laboratory, while positives weresent to the MRO, the employer would know for certain that some identifiableemployees were ``lab negatives'' and others were ``lab positives'' whosetests the MRO did not verify positive. The employer would know this simplyfrom the fact of whether it got a negative result from the lab or the MRO.A ``lab positive/verification negative'' employee could easily be stigmatizedas a drug user, or be subject to employer inquiries about medical use ofdrugs. This would be contrary to the intent of the rule with respect toemployee confidentiality.It was also suggested that MROs should not have to review positive pre-employmenttests, or not review any tests except post-accident tests, or not reviewany tests at all. Laboratory positive tests not going to the MRO wouldgo directly to the employer, who could take action against the employeeor applicant immediately upon receipt. MRO review would occur only if anemployee appealed the positive test. The advantage of this approach, commentssaid, is that it would allow employers to act quickly to remove drug abusersfrom safety sensitive positions, rather than incurring potential liabilityfor an accident that might happen during the course of MRO verification.The Department has not adopted this comment. The Department's rules areintended to result in the removal from safety sensitive positions onlythose individuals who are determined to have engaged in prohibited druguse. Until an MRO verifies that a positive laboratory result representsprohibited drug use (e.g., that there is not a legitimate explanation forthe laboratory result), the condition on which employer action under theregulations is premised has not come into being. MRO verification priorto employer action is essential to the accomplishment of the purpose ofthese regulations.The Department does not see any policy distinction between the need forMRO verification of one sort of test and another. In any case, a confirmedpositive test resulting from legitimate use of a drug, if not subject toMRO verification procedures, can result in economic harm to, and stigmatizationas an illicit drug user of, an innocent party. The final rule will continueto require MRO verification for all tests.Comments asked that MROs, in making verification decisions, be able toconsider results of tests of the employee's urine made in other labs. Thisissue is addressed by andSection; 40.33(b), which provides that MROs maynot consider results of urine samples that are not obtained or processedin accordance with the DOT procedures. For example, if a ``split sample''is taken, all procedures affecting the second part of the sample must bethe same as for the first, and all tests must be done in a DHHS-certifiedlaboratory. Only under these conditions could the MRO consider a resultfrom a second lab. The MRO could not consider samples taken under otherconditions or at a different time. If the two lab results turned out tobe different (e.g., one positive, one negative), the MRO would cancel thetest and contact the laboratory director(s) and attempt to discover thereason for the discrepancy. (The same procedure would be followed if aretest of a ``positive'' specimen had a negative result.) As followingany cancelled test, the employer would direct the employee to take anothersubsequent test, if appropriate.c. <T3>MRO procedures</T3>_Some comments expressed concern that the regulationrequires MROs to talk to employees face-to-face, a clear impracticalityin many instances. The MRO must provide an opportunity for an interviewof an employee testing positive as part of the verification process, butthis conversation can happen via telephone or other means as well as aface-to-face discussion. If the employee, however, affirmatively turnsdown the opportunity (e.g., tells the MRO he does not want to discuss thematter), the MRO may proceed with verification.The timing of the verification process concerned a number of commenters.For example, suppose an MRO is unable to locate an employee, or the employeedoes not return the MRO's calls. How long is the MRO supposed to wait beforeverifying a test as positive? The Department has incorporated the followingprocedure into the regulations. The MRO makes an active attempt to contactthe employee. This is intended to be the primary means by which the employeeis contacted; other means are mechanisms intended to be used only if theMRO's direct attempt is unsuccessful. If this attempt does not succeedafter the MRO has made all reasonable efforts (i.e., the MRO has triedall the means of getting hold of the individual within a reasonable timethat can reasonably be expected to be productive) the MRO would contacta designated employer representative. (What constitutes a reasonable time,and what reasonable efforts must be made, are matters for the MRO's judgment,which can vary with the circumstances of different industries or employers.For example, the time, and the sort of efforts that would be involved,may differ depending on whether the employee involved is a truck driverwho is on a cross-country trip, as opposed to a mass transit bus driverwho checks into a terminal every morning before starting to drive.) TheMRO will not inform the employer representative of the reason for thisrequest, and the employer representative must take appropriate steps tosafeguard confidentiality.The employer representative must contact the employee and tell the employeeto contact the MRO as soon as possible. This should be done, whenever possible,prior to the employee's next performing his or her safety-sensitive function.If the employer representative is unable to contact the employee, the employercould place the employee on medical leave or temporary medically unqualifiedstatus. The test would still not be a verified positive until the employeehad the opportunity to talk with the MRO, but the individual would notbe performing a safety-sensitive function in the meantime.In order to prevent undue delays covered by an employee's refusal to contactthe MRO, the MRO could verify a confirmed positive test result if, fivedays after a documented contact between the MRO or designated employerrepresentative that informed the employee that he or she was to talk tothe MRO, the employee had failed to do so. The rationale for the provisionwould be that, having been told to talk to the MRO, the employee, by decliningto do so, has waived the opportunity to prevent information concerningpossible legitimate explanations for a confirmed positive drug test. Asa safeguard for employees, the MRO could review the verification if theemployee demonstrated that circumstances prevented the contact (e.g., theemployee produced medical records to show that, the day after the employercontact, the employee was seriously injured in an automobile accident andwas hospitalized for several days). If the MRO ``reopened'' the verificationin such a case, and the employee was able to demonstrate a legitimate medicalexplanation for the confirmed laboratory positive, the test result wouldbe changed to a negative.Another suggestion was that the laboratory should routinely provide thequantitation of positive tests to the MRO, rather than only upon MRO request.The Department does not see the need for such a requirement. The MRO typicallyneeds to know only that a test was confirmed positive. In most cases, thequantitation is not relevant to the MRO's job. When the MRO, for some reason,believes that quantitation is needed, the laboratory is obligated to provideit. This seems sufficient for accomplishing the purposes of the rule.A question has been raised concerning whether the MRO may begin verificationimmediately upon receiving notification from laboratory of a confirmedpositive result (e.g., by fax or computer link). The MRO may indeed beginthe verification process at this point, by contacting the employee andobtaining the employee's explanation of the positive result. However, theMRO is not to declare a verified positive until he or she receives thehard copy of the original chain of custody form from the laboratory. Thisis because, prior to determining that the test is a verified positive,the MRO verifies the identifying information and the facial completenessof the chain of custody (i.e., determines that, on the face of the document,all the sign-offs are in the right places).There was a request for clarification concerning whether one MRO couldserve all the employers participating in a consortium. This is the case;indeed, the main purpose of a consortium is to allow employers to sharethe services and costs of MROs, collectors, laboratories, etc.d. <T3>Confidentiality issues.</T3> Under the current regulations, the MROis directed to tell the employer only whether the drug test is positiveor negative (see andSection; 40.27(g)(3)). This implies, but does not explicitlystate, that the MRO would not inform management of other information developedin the verification process that could affect safety. Some comments pointedout that it puts an employee in a difficult position if, in order to explaina confirmed positive result as legitimate drug use, he or she must revealinformation which will be passed on to an employer who then may take adverseaction against the employee as a result. The passing on of this informationmay also raise issues about whether the MRO has breached a duty of confidentiality.On the other hand, if the MRO learns about legal use of medications byan employee that may cause or reveal a safety problem, the MRO may havelegitimate concerns about his responsibility to protect public safety andhis liability in any subsequent accident attributable to the employee'suse of the legal drug.To balance these considerations, the Department has incorporated the followingapproach in the final rule. The MRO would inform the employee, before beginningthe verification interview, that the MRO could transmit to appropriateparties (e.g., the employer, a certifying physician, a DOT agency) informationconcerning medications being used by the employee or the employee's medicalcondition only if, in the MRO's medical judgment, the information indicatedthat the employee may be medically unqualified under applicable DOT agencyrules or would otherwise present a safety hazard. Information could alsobe transmitted to third parties if DOT agency regulations so provide (e.g.,a DOT agency regulation calling for the provision of information to theNational Transportation Safety Board in an accident investigation). TheMRO could then transmit the information (e.g., that the employee was regularlytaking medication that made him very drowsy while on the job).Another confidentiality issue concerns formal proceedings (e.g., lawsuits,grievances, arbitrations) in which an employee challenges action takenby an employer as the result of a drug test. Normally, information aboutdrug tests (see andSection;andSection; 40.27(g)(3), 40.35, and 40.37) is releasableonly with the consent of the employee. However, it would be unfair if,in an adversarial proceeding, one side had access to information whichthe other did not. Consequently, we have clarified the regulation to providefor the release of relevant information to management in the context ofsuch a proceeding.8. The Chain of Custody FormThe Department received a substantial number of comments concerning thechain of custody form. The Department, working with DHHS, has drafted arevised chain of custody form, which it tested in the Department's internalprogram. In addition, a number of comments included suggestions for revisingthe form. The Department has produced, from these sources, a revised chainof custody form for use by employers covered by DOT drug testing regulations.It is set out at appendix A. The portions of this regulation pertainingto the form (see andSection; 40.23(a)) have been changed from the interimfinal rule to be consistent with the new form.Employers are not required to ``photocopy'' this form; they may gatherthe information in a somewhat different format. However, employers arerequired to gather the information called for in andSection; 40.23(a) andmay not gather information inconsistent with that called for in these rules(e.g., information that could compromise employee confidentiality). A formthat, for example, was only a three-part form rather than a six-part form,or which failed to include the certifications, chain-of-custody provisionsetc. called for in the regulation would not be consistent with part 40requirements.It should be noted that the back of copy 4 of the form (the employee'scopy) contains space on which the employee can note, as his or her ownprivate ``memory jogger,'' medications or other substances which he orshe is taking. This use of the space by the employee is entirely voluntary;employers may not insist on its use, and the information is not intendedto be provided to the employer.The Department is aware that, as testing begins for many employers in December1989, they may not have time to get copies of the new form printed beforetesting begins. As a transitional measure, employers may continue to useforms complying with the interim final rule for a reasonable time. Allnew printings of forms must conform to the revised form. We urge transitionto the new form as soon as possible.9. Recordkeeping and ReportingOne issue mentioned in a number of comments concerns ``batch reporting.''Section 40.29(g)(1) of the interim final rule requires that the laboratoryreport all positive and negative results of samples submitted at the sametime to the MRO at the same time. Some comments objected to this requirementon the grounds that it unnecessarily kept information from employers aboutnegative tests during the time it took for MROs to verify the positivetests in the ``batch.'' The purpose of the batch testing requirement wasto prevent the employer from inferring which employees had positive testresults from the lab (even if the tests ultimately were not verified aspositives), since this inference could lead to stigmatization of the employees.The Department believes that the batch reporting requirement is no longernecessary and has removed it from the rule. It is our understanding that,given the individual chain of custody form that would be used predominantlyfor DOT-mandated drug testing and the way that samples are processed inDHHS-certified laboratories, it is no longer relevant to conceive samplesas arriving at and departing from laboratories in easily identifiable batches.Under these circumstances, the Department will permit laboratories to reportindividual results to the MRO as they become available. Likewise, MROscould report the results to the employer as they become available or, inthe case of positives, as they are verified.The Department will maintain the prohibition on the provision of resultsfrom the lab to the MRO by telephone. The potential for garbling of informationin voice communications is too great. Provision of results in a writtenform (e.g., fax, computer link, hard copy) are needed. The Department alsorecommends that MROs pass on results to employers in a written form, lestmishearing of information in a phone conversation result in mistaken actionwith respect to an employee.There were a number of comments concerning the monthly report providedby the laboratory to the employer (andSection; 40.29(g)(6)). One was thatthe report should not distinguish between confirmed and unconfirmed positives.The Department has not adopted this comment, on the ground that this aggregateinformation may be of use to employers and is likely to involve minimalcost. Another comment suggested providing this report directly to unionsas well as to the employer. The Department will not mandate transmissionof the report to unions, though this may be an appropriate subject forcollective bargaining. Finally, a commenter expressed concern that forsmall employers, the facially aggregated data could provide individuallyidentifiable information about employees. For example, if an employer onlyhad two tests during a month, and one was positive, it would be easy forthe employer to infer from the data that a specific other employee hada screen positive. To get around this problem, the rule has been changedto require labs to refrain from sending the monthly report where the datais not sufficiently aggregated to prevent compromise of information aboutparticular individuals. In such a case, the laboratory would not providethe report until a time (e.g., a month or two later) when the data wassufficiently aggregated. (On a similar matter, laboratories and other partiesshould refrain from billing practices that would permit employers readilyto identify individual employee's results.)Comments suggested that employees should be notified if there is evidenceof tampering or other problems with a sample (employees would be notifiedof a cancelled test, which would be the typical result of such problems)or, with respect to employees who had tested positive recently, if a blindsample resulted in a false positive (unnecessary, in the Department's view,in light of the provisions for retests in andSection; 40.31(D)(6) and thefact that a false positive on a blind sample can result in action againstthe lab, up to and including the loss of certification). Either of thesekinds of actions could also result in investigation by the concerned DOTagency or office. There was also a request for direct notification of employees,not just the MRO, of test results within five days. Since the role of theMRO in determining test results and maintaining confidentiality is veryimportant, the Department believes the existing provision should be retained.There were various suggestions for changing record retention requirements(e.g., reducing record retention periods, avoiding storing positive samplesfor a year for possible retests). The Department has concluded that existingrecord retention requirements are needed to facilitate monitoring of thetesting process and keep sufficient safeguards of the accuracy of the processin place. It should be noted that records may be kept electronically orby other means (e.g., microfiche) as well as in paper hard copy.10. Rulemaking Procedure and Other IssuesSome comments asked that a ``waiver'' provision be included in the regulation.Such a provision would allow individual employers or industries, on theirown or with the consent of the relevant DOT operating administration, toestablish different testing procedures from those set forth in the regulation.This would permit the various employers or industries to have testing proceduresthat fit their circumstances better than the general provisions of therule, it was said.The Department has not adopted this comment. The matters about which waiverswould most likely be sought, based on the comments, are those on whichcomments indicated that employers preferred to proceed differently frompart 40 (e.g., which drugs are tested for, positive thresholds, use ofDHHS-certified labs, use of on-site screening tests, MRO verification ofpositives). These are matters that the Department has considered and decidedin this rulemaking. Having made decisions on these issues, which affectemployees as well as employers, the Department does not think it advisableto invite requests by employers to design their own procedures, which couldbe inconsistent with, and contrary to the rationale of, the provisionsof this rule. The result could be substantial inconsistency among employersand industries and the erosion of necessary legal and practical protectionsfor employees, which are crucial to the success of the program.It should be pointed out that, as an Office of the Secretary of Transportationrule, part 40 is subject to the exemption procedures of 49 CFR 5.11-5.13.Under these procedures, any party may petition the Secretary for an exemptionto a rule. The grounds on which an exemption may be granted are narrow.An exemption is granted only on the basis of a showing of special circumstances,not contemplated in the rulemaking, that make compliance with the generallyapplicable rule infeasible. By special circumstances, we mean circumstancespeculiar to the applicant, which are not generally applicable to a classof parties. An exemption request is not a forum for reasserting argumentsor positions considered during the rulemaking, or for seeking a <T3>de facto</T3> amendment to the rule. Nor are exemptions granted onthe basis that the applicant would find it preferable to proceed in a wayother than that set forth in the rule.On the basis that urine testing is such a bad idea that no set of procedurescould redeem it, some comments urged abolishing the procedures (and, implicitly,the entire DOT drug testing program as well). The Department is well awareof the controversial nature of drug testing. The Department is committedto drug testing as being necessary for transportation safety. These proceduresare the best means of which the Department is aware to ensure that testingis fair and accurate. Other commenters urged abolishing the proceduresor making them voluntary so that employers could devise their own procedures.Given the number of employers covered by DOT drug testing rules, and thevarying resources available to them, the Department believes that consistentprocedures that protect the accuracy and integrity of testing and successfullybalance the legitimate interests of employers and employees would be difficultto achieve under such a ``voluntary'' approach.Some comments questioned the validity of issuing an interim final rule,saying that an NPRM should have been issued first or that a supplementalnotice of proposed rulemaking (SNPRM) should be issued before a revisedfinal rule. The Department does not believe that either is called for.Before the issuance of the interim final rule in November 1988, commentershad the chance to address the applicability of the DHHS Guidelines to theDOT drug testing program in the context of six operating administrationNPRMs. That the Department decided, as a matter of administrative convenience,to issue one procedural rule applicable to all six operating administrationrules rather than incorporating or referencing the DHHS Guidelines or amodification of them in six individual rules does not affect the validityof the rulemaking process. (It should also be pointed out that the DHHSGuidelines themselves were published after an opportunity for public comment.)After reviewing the comments pertaining to testing procedures made in responseto the six operating administration NPRMs and the comments on the interimfinal rule, the Department is convinced that the issues have been thoroughlyraised and responded to, and that a further opportunity to comment in anSNPRM would only delay necessary revisions of the interim final rule, ratherthan obtain additional useful suggestions. Therefore, the Department isproceeding to a final rule at this time.A few comments also questioned the underlying legal authority for the rule.The rule is an Office of the Secretary rule, published under the generalrulemaking authority available to the Secretary of Transportation. Theoperating administration rules, issued under the safety and/or grant programrulemaking authority of the several administrations, are the source ofthe requirement that regulated employers use the part 40 procedures.Other comments concerned the regulatory evaluation, regulatory flexibilitystatement, and federalism statement. The costs of drug testing, and oftesting according to these procedures, are imposed on regulated partiesnot by part 40 but by the six operating administration rules. The costswere taken into account in the regulatory evaluations for those rules anddo not need to be repeated in connection with part 40.The same can be said, as a general matter, for the impact of part 40 onsmall entities. One point made in this connection was that the requirementof part 40 for DHHS certification of laboratories could reduce opportunitiesfor small laboratories. The Department does not believe that this is thecase. DHHS certification is available to any laboratory meeting DHHS requirements,which do not include a size minimum. The 37 laboratories certified to dateby DHHS include smaller as well as larger laboratories. While some laboratories,including small laboratories, may conclude that the business they wouldgain through DHHS certification is not sufficient to make DHHS certificationworthwhile to pursue, the Department does not believe that this makes acase for altering the standards for participation in the DOT drug testingprogram, which must remain high in order to protect the integrity of theprogram.With respect to federalism, a comment suggested that there may be a federalismimpact on state and local laboratory certification standards. The requirementsfor the use of DHHS-certified laboratories does not in any way affect orpreempt state or local laboratory certification standards, which will continueto apply without change within their ambit. Part 40 simply says that forpurposes of a new Federal testing requirement, DHHS certification is requiredin addition to whatever standards laboratories must meet under state orlocal law.<ITAG tagnum="84">Section-by-Section Analysis of Changes in the Final Rule</ITAG>The Department is printing the complete text of part 40, as amended, inorder to facilitate its use by affected parties. As a guide to the changesmade in this amendment, this section of the preamble lists the changeswhich this amendment makes to each section of part 40.<T3>Heading.</T3> The Table of Contents is changed by deleting the referenceto subpart C and by changing the number of the section on the use of DHHS-certifiedlaboratories from 40.41 to 40.39. The reference to the DHHS certificationstandards has been deleted (as has the old appendix A itself); appendixA now contains the drug testing custody and control form. A reference to49 U.S.C. 322 has been added to the authority citation. This citation,which is to the statute containing the Secretary's general rulemaking authority,was inadvertently omitted from the publication of the interim final rule.<T3>Section 40.3 Definitions.</T3> A definition of ``blind sample'' hasbeen added. An addition has been made to the definition of ``collectionsite person,'' providing that unless it is impracticable for any otherindividual to perform this function, a direct supervisor of an employeeshall not serve as the collection site person for a test of the employee.This definition also clarifies what ``monitoring'' of a drug test means.Definitions have also been added to distinguish three kinds of containersused in the collection process; the collection container, specimen bottle,and shipping container.<T3>Section 40.23 Preparation for Testing.</T3> Paragraph 40.23(a), concerningthe drug testing custody and control form, has been changed in accordancewith the revised form. Paragraph 40.23(b) now contains, as subparagraph(1), a requirement for the use of a sealed specimen container, which willbe presented to the employee for unsealing at the beginning of the testprocedure. The existing language of paragraph (b) has been renumbered assubparagraph (2).<T3>Section 40.23 Specimen Collection Procedures.</T3> Subparagraph 40.25(e)(2)(i)has been amended by deleting the words at the end concerning the oral temperaturenot equalling or exceeding that of the specimen. The temperature rangeprovision has been clarified.Subparagraph (f)(2) contains new language at the end providing that onemployee request, the collection site person shall show his or her identificationto the employee. Language has been added at the end of subparagraph (f)(4)directing that if an employee requests it, the collection site person shallprovide the employee a receipt for any personal belongings. Subparagraph(f)(8) now contains language requiring that the collection site personprovide to the individual a sealed specimen container for purposes of givingthe sample.Subparagraph (f)(10)(i) concerns the ``shy bladder'' problem. The new languageprovides that if the individual is unable to provide 60 ml of urine, thecollection site person shall direct the individual to drink fluids and,after a reasonable time, try again to provide a complete sample. In thecase of a post-accident or reasonable cause test, the individual is notrequired to continue the procedure beyond eight hours from the start ofthe collection procedure. For other types of testing, another option isprovided, under which the employer is notified, and the individual is scheduledfor an unannounced drug test in the near future (if an employee) or scheduledfor a new preemployment test (if an applicant; of course, the employerneed not hire an applicant and the referral for further evaluation or testingis not mandatory in the preemployment situation, if the employer does notwant to hire the person). If the individual cannot produce a complete samplewithin the eight-hour period or at the subsequent test, the employer mustrefer the individual to a physician for a medical evaluation of whetherthe problem is genuine or amounts to a refusal to take a drug test. Alsoin subparagraph (f)(10), new subparagraph (ii) has been added, permitting,but not requiring, the use of ``split samples.'' It should be noted thatthe test of the second part of a ``split sample'' is only for presenceof the drug(s) found positive on the first test (i.e., the cutoff valuesof andSection; 40.29 do not apply). A new subparagraph (iii) specifies that,except for split samples under subparagraph (ii), no portion of the samplecollected under this part may be used for any purpose other than drug testingrequired under DOT regulations.A new paragraph (j) has been added, concerning employees requiring medicalattention. The paragraph provides that if the collection is being madefrom an employee in need of medical attention (e.g., in a post-accidenttest), necessary medical attention shall not be delayed in order to takethe sample.<T3>Section 40.29 Laboratory Analysis Procedures.</T3> Subparagraph 40.29(g)(1)has been amended by deleting the last sentence, which required ``batchreporting.'' Subparagraph 40.29(g)(3) has been amended by adding a provisothat the MRO may reveal the quantitation of a positive test result to theemployer, the employee, or the decisionmaker in a lawsuit, grievance orother proceeding initiated by or on behalf of the employee and arisingfrom a verified positive drug test (including a challenge by an employeeto an action by a DOT agency concerning the employee's medical certificate,license, or other document).Subparagraph (g)(6) has been amended by adding language providing thatmonthly reports shall not include data from which it is reasonably likelythat information about individuals' tests can be readily inferred. If necessaryin order to prevent disclosure of such data, the laboratory shall not senda report until data are sufficiently aggregated to make such an inferenceunlikely. In any month in which a report is withheld for this reason, thelaboratory would so inform the employer in writing.<T3>Section 40.31 Quality Assurance and Quality Control.</T3> In subparagraph(d)(2) of this section, the blind testing requirements have been simplifiedand the rates reduced. All employers, regardless of size, are covered.Each employer must submit three blind samples for every 100 employee specimenssubmitted, to a maximum of 100 blind samples per quarter. A DOT agencycould increase this maximum if necessary, for extremely large employeesor consortiums. For employees with fewer than 2000 covered employees, lowercost methods of supplying blind samples are authorized by subparagraph(d)(4). Blind testing need not begin until 180 days after publication ofthe rule for employers with fewer than 2000 employees. Subparagraph (5)clarifies that a consortium submits blind samples on behalf of its members.<T3>Section 40.33 Reporting and Review of Results.</T3> In paragraph (a),the word ``results'' at the end of the first sentence has been changedto the words ``confirmed positive results from the laboratory'' as a clarification,to emphasize that a review of negative results is not necessary. At theend of this paragraph, a sentence has been added to make explicit thatthe MRO review shall include review of the drug testing chain of custodyform to ensure that it is complete and sufficient on its face.In paragraph (b), a sentence has been added after the first present sentencestating that the MRO shall not be an employee of the laboratory conductingthe drug test unless the laboratory establishes a clear separation of functionsto prevent any appearance of a conflict of interest, including assuringthat the MRO has no responsibility for and is not supervised by or thesupervisor of, any persons who have the responsibility for the drug testingor quality control operations of the laboratory. Later in this paragraph,clarifying amendments have been made to the sentence beginning ``This action''to say that the action in question includes ``conducting a medical interviewwith the individual'' and may also include review of the individual's medicalhistory or review of any other relevant biomedical factors.Paragraph (c) has been amended by adding the words ``for an individual''after the words ``positive test result'' in the first sentence. New languagehas been added following the first sentence. It says that the MRO shallmake all reasonable efforts to contact the employee directly. If the MROis unable to contact the employee directly after making these efforts,the MRO would contact a representative of the employer and request thatthe employer direct the employee to contact the MRO as soon as possible.If the employer cannot get hold of the employee within a reasonable time,the employer may place the employee on medical leave or temporary medicallyunqualified status. If the employer representative does contact the individual,the MRO may declare the test a verified positive if, after five days havepassed from a documented contact instructing the employee to talk to theMRO, the employee has not done so. To protect employees, the MRO may reexaminethe verification if the employee documents that exigent circumstances preventedthe employee from contacting the MRO in time.A new paragraph (h) has been added after the end of this section concerningthe disclosure of other medical information. It provides that the MRO maydisclose medical information learned as part of the testing/verificationprocess only if the MRO concludes that the information concerns use ofmedications or a medical condition that could result in the employee becomingmedically unqualified under applicable DOT rules or which otherwise couldadversely effect transportation safety. The MRO would inform the employee,at the start of the verification interview, of the potential disclosureof such information.<T3>Section 40.35 Protection of employee records.</T3> A sentence has beenadded at the end of this section providing that the laboratory shall discloseinformation related to a positive drug test of an individual to the individual,the employer or the decisionmaker in a lawsuit, grievance or other formalproceeding initiated by or on behalf of the individual and arising froma verified positive drug test (including a challenge to a DOT agency'saction concerning an employee; medical certificate, license, or other document).<T3>Section 40.39 Use of DHHS-certified laboratories.</T3> The sectionnumber for this section has been changed from andSection; 40.41 to andSection;40.39. The last two sentences of the section, referring to the DHHS certificationstandards set forth in appendix A, have been deleted, as has the old appendixA itself.<ITAG tagnum="84">Enforcement Considerations</ITAG>Although not directly as a part of this rulemaking, a number of personshave raised concerns about the enforcement of the Department's drug testingprograms. The six operating administration rules to which part 40 proceduresapply are part of existing statutory and regulatory systems. Generally,they will be enforced in the same way as the rest of those systems. Forexample, FAA and FHWA personnel inspect the equipment and records of thecarriers they regulate. If they find rule violations, they may initiateenforcement proceedings and impose civil penalties. The FAA or FHWA personnelwould add review of compliance with drug testing requirements to the otherchecks they make of employers' compliance with safety rules.During the initial stages of the implementation of the Department's drugtesting rules, the Department's focus will be on assisting employers tocomply with the regulations, not on penalizing inadvertent or minor errors.At the same time, the Department will not tolerate intentional violationsof the rules or deliberate schemes to avoid compliance.For example, one major industry association has expressed concern thatsham consortiums could be created. Such a sham would allow members to claimthat covered employees were being tested, but little or no testing wouldactually take place. If the Department were to determine that such a shamconsortium existed, the Department would take all enforcement action possibleunder its regulations and, since false statements or fraudulent documentationmay be involved, refer appropriate cases to Federal law enforcement authoritiesfor possible criminal prosecution.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Process Matters</ITAG>This is not a major rule under Executive Order 12291. It is a significantrule under the Department's Regulatory Policies and Procedures, since itaffects several operating administrations and the industries they regulate.The costs of conducting drug testing conforming with these procedures wereanalyzed in the regulatory evaluations or regulatory impact analyses forthe operating administration drug-testing rules. The provisions of thisfinal rule which may affect costs are relatively few. Use of a sealed collectioncontainer/specimen bottle is likely to add only marginally to program costs;this is already common practice, in any case. Since the use of a ``splitsample'' is not mandatory, any costs incurred by employers for this purposeare assumed to be voluntary. The elimination of the ``batch reporting''requirement may result in marginal savings to labs and employers in reportingcosts.There should be significant saving to larger employers because of reductionsin blind testing requirements. The maximum number of blind samples to besubmitted per quarter has also been lowered. The costs to employers shouldbe reduced proportionately. Costs will also be lower because of projectedreductions in per sample costs (e.g., to $10-20 per sample, according toinformation from DHHS.This saving will be offset, to some degree, by adding blind sample requirementsfor smaller companies. But the low rate of testing for these companies,added to the lower-cost alternatives for blind samples, should mean thatindividual employers will not face a heavy burden. For example, a truckingcompany with 50 covered drivers (assuming a 50 percent random testing rateand the replacement of half of its drivers per year) would have to submitonly three blind samples every two years, at minimal cost.This rule will affect small entities in all the industries covered by DOToperating administration drug rules. The basic small entity impacts ofeach rule have been considered as part of the operating administrations'rulemakings. The rule to which these amendments apply includes steps toreduce small entity impacts in such areas as inspections, submission ofblind samples, and permanent log books. Consequently, the Department certifiesthat 49 CFR part 40 will not have a significant economic impact on a substantialnumber of small entities.The Department has considered the federalism implications of this ruleunder Executive Order 12612. The Department has determined that this ruledoes not have sufficient federalism implications to warrant the preparationof a federalism assessment. Federalism implications of individual operatingadministrations' drug rules are discussed in those rulemaking documents.The reporting and recordkeeping requirements referenced in this regulationhave been submitted for Paperwork Reduction Act approval to the Officeof Management and Budget by the respective DOT operating administrationsin connection with their own drug rules. This is because it is the operatingadministration rules, rather than this rule, that actually impose the requirementson regulated parties. However, the Office of the Secretary is seeking OMBapproval under the Paperwork Reduction Act for the revised form. A <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice will be published when Paperwork Act Approvalis obtained.<ITAG tagnum="21">Issued this 27th day of November 1989 at Washington, DC.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Samuel K. Skinner,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary of Transportation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 49 CFR Part 40</ITAG>Controlled substances, Transportation.For the reasons set forth in the preamble, the Department of Transportationmakes the following amendments in title 49, Code of Federal Regulations,part 40:1. The authority citation for 49 CFR part 40 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 49 U.S.C. 102, 301, 322.</ITAG>2. 49 CFR part 40 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 40_PROCEDURES FOR TRANSPORTATION WORKPLACE DRUG TESTING PROGRAMS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.1 Applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.3 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.5-40.19 [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.21 The drugs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.23 Preparation for testing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.25 Specimen collection procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.27 Laboratory personnel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.29 Laboratory analysis procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.31 Quality assurance and quality control.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.33 Reporting and review of results.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.35 Protection of employee records.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.37 Individual access to test and laboratory certification results.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">40.39 Use of DHHS_certified laboratories.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix A to Part 40_Drug Testing Custody and Control Form</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 49 U.S.C. 102, 301, 322.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Applicability.</ITAG>This part applies to transportation employers (including self-employedindividuals) conducting drug urine testing programs pursuant to regulationsissued by agencies of the Department of Transportation and to such transportationemployers' officers, employees, agents and contractors, to the extent andin the manner provided in DOT agency regulations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Definitions.</ITAG>For purposes of this part the following definitions apply:<T3>Aliquot.</T3> A portion of a specimen used for testing.<T3>Blind sample or blind performance test specimen.</T3> A urine specimensubmitted to a laboratory for quality control testing purposes, with afictitious identifier, so that the laboratory cannot distinguish it fromemployee specimens, and which is spiked with known quantities of specificdrugs or which is blank, containing no drugs.<T3>Chain of custody.</T3> Procedures to account for the integrity of eachurine specimen by tracking its handling and storage from point of specimencollection to final disposition of the specimen. These procedures shallrequire that an appropriate drug testing custody form (see andSection; 40.23(a))be used from time of collection to receipt by the laboratory and that uponreceipt by the laboratory an appropriate laboratory chain of custody form(s)account(s) for the sample or sample aliquots within the laboratory.<T3>Collection container.</T3> A container into which the employee urinatesto provide the urine sample used for a drug test.<T3>Collection site.</T3> A place designated by the employer where individualspresent themselves for the purpose of providing a specimen of their urineto be analyzed for the presence of drugs.<T3>Collection site person.</T3> A person who instructs and assists individualsat a collection site and who receives and makes an initial examinationof the urine specimen provided by those individuals.<T3>Confirmatory test.</T3> A second analytical procedure to identify thepresence of a specific drug or metabolite which is independent of the initialtest and which uses a different technique and chemical principle from thatof the initial test in order to ensure reliability and accuracy. (Gas chromatography/massspectrometry (GC/MS) is the only authorized confirmation method for cocaine,marijuana, opiates, amphetamines, and phencyclidine.)<T3>DHHS.</T3> The Department of Health and Human Services or any designeeof the Secretary, Department of Health and Human Services.<T3>DOT agency.</T3> An agency (or ``operating administration'') of theUnited States Department of Transportation administering regulations requiringcompliance with this part, including the United States Coast Guard, theFederal Aviation Administration, the Federal Railroad Administration, theFederal Highway Administration, the Urban Mass Transportation Administrationand the Research and Special Programs Administration.<T3>Employee.</T3> An individual designated in a DOT agency regulationas subject to drug urine testing and the donor of a specimen under thispart. As used in this part ``employee'' includes an applicant for employment.``Employee'' and ``individual'' or ``individual to be tested'' have thesame meaning for purposes of this part.<T3>Employer.</T3> An entity employing one or more employees that is subjectto DOT agency regulations requiring compliance with this part. As usedin this part, ``employer'' includes an industry consortium or joint enterprisecomprised of two or more employing entities, but no single employing entityis relieved of its responsibility for compliance with this part by virtueof participation in such a consortium or joint enterprise.<T3>Initial test (also known as screening test).</T3> An immunoassay screento eliminate ``negative'' urine specimens from further consideration.<T3>Medical Review Officer (MRO).</T3> A licensed physician responsiblefor receiving laboratory results generated by an employer's drug testingprogram who has knowledge of substance abuse disorders and has appropriatemedical training to interpret and evaluate an individual's confirmed positivetest result together with his or her medical history and any other relevantbiomedical information.<T3>Secretary.</T3> The Secretary of Transportation or the Secretary'sdesignee.<T3>Shipping container.</T3> A container capable of being secured witha tamper proof seal that is used for transfer of one or more specimen bottle(s)and associated documentation from the collection site to the laboratory.<T3>Specimen bottle.</T3> The bottle which, after being labeled and sealedaccording to the procedures in this part, is used to transmit a urine sampleto the laboratory.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 40.5-40.19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> The drugs.</ITAG>(a) DOT agency drug testing programs require that employers test for marijuana,cocaine, opiates, amphetamines and phencyclidine.(b) An employer may include in its testing protocols other controlled substancesor alcohol only pursuant to a DOT agency approval, if testing for thosesubstances is authorized under agency regulations and if the DHHS has establishedan approved testing protocol and positive threshold for each such substance.(c) Urine specimens collected under DOT agency regulations requiring compliancewith this part may only be used to test for controlled substances designatedor approved for testing as described in this section and shall not be usedto conduct any other analysis or test unless otherwise specifically authorizedby DOT agency regulations.(d) This section does not prohibit procedures reasonably incident to analysisof the specimen for controlled substances (e.g., determination of pH ortests for specific gravity, creatinine concentration or presence of adulterants).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Preparation for testing.</ITAG>The employer and certified laboratory shall develop and maintain a clearand well-documented procedure for collection, shipment, and accessioningof urine specimens under this part. Such a procedure shall include, ata minimum, the following:(a) Utilization of a standard drug testing custody and control form (carbonlessmanifold). The form shall be a multiple-part, carbonless record form withan original (copy 1), and a ``second original'' (copy 2), both of whichshall accompany the specimen to the laboratory. Copies shall be providedfor the Medical Review Officer (copy 3, to go directly to the MRO), thedonor (copy 4), the collector (copy 5), and the employer representative(copy 6). If the employer desires to exercise the split sample option,then an additional copy of the urine custody and control form is required.This copy (copy 7) shall be the ``split specimen original,'' and is toaccompany the split specimen to the same lab, a second lab, or an employerstorage site. There must be a positive link established between the firstspecimen and the split specimen through the specimen identification number;the split specimen identification number shall be an obvious derivativeof the first specimen identification number. The form should be a permanentrecord on which identifying data on the donor, and on the specimen collectionand transfer process, is retained. The form shall be constructed to display,at a minimum, the following elements, which shall appear on its respectiveparts as indicated:(1) The following information shall appear on all parts of the form:(i) A preprinted specimen identification number, which shall be uniqueto the particular collection. If the split sample option is exercised,the preprinted specimen identification number for split specimen shallbe an obvious derivative of the first specimen; e.g., first specimen identificationnumber suffixed ``A,'' split specimen suffixed ``B.''(ii) A block specifying the donor's employee identification number or SocialSecurity number, which shall be entered by the collector.(iii) A block specifying the employer's name, address, and identificationnumber.(iv) A block specifying the Medical Review Officer's name and address.(v) Specification for which drugs the specimen identified by this formwill be tested.(vi) Specification for the reason for which this test conducted (preemployment,random, etc.), which shall be entered by the collector.(vii) A block specifying whether or not the collector read the temperaturewithin 4 minutes, and then notation, by the collector, that the temperatureof specimen just read is within the range of 32.5-37.7C/90.5-99.8F; ifnot within the acceptable range, an area is provided to record the actualtemperature.(viii) A chain-of-custody block providing areas to enter the followinginformation for each transfer of possession: Purpose of change; releasedby (signature/print name); received by (signature/print name); date. Thewords ``Provide specimen for testing'' and ``DONOR'' shall be preprintedin the initial spaces.(ix) Information to be completed by the collector: Collector's name; dateof collection; location of the collection site; a space for remarks atwhich unusual circumstances may be described; notation as to whether ornot the split specimen was taken in accordance with Federal requirements<T3>if</T3> the option to offer the split specimen was exercised by theemployer; and a certification statement as set forth below and a signatureblock with date which shall be completed by the collector:<ITAG tagnum="21">I certify that the specimen identified on this form is the specimenpresented to me by the donor providing the certification on Copy 3 of thisform, that it bears the same identification number as that set forth above,and that it has been collected, labelled and sealed as in accordance withapplicable Federal requirements.</ITAG>(2) Information to be provided by the laboratory after analysis, whichshall appear on parts 1, 2 and 7 (if applicable) of the form only: Accessionnumber; laboratory name; address; a space for remarks; specimen results;and certification statement as set forth below, together with spaces toenter the printed name and signature of the certifying laboratory officialand date:<ITAG tagnum="21">I certify that the specimen identified by this accession number isthe same specimen that bears the identification number set forth above,that the specimen has been examined upon receipt, handled and analyzedin accordance with applicable Federal requirements, and that the resultsset forth below are for that specimen.</ITAG>(3) A block to be completed by the Medical Review Officer (MRO), afterthe review of the specimen, which shall appear on parts 1, 2 and 7 (ifapplicable) of the form only, provides for the MRO's name, address, andcertification, to read as follows, together with spaces for signature anddate:<ITAG tagnum="21">I have reviewed the laboratory results for the specimen identifiedby this form in accordance with applicable Federal requirements. My finaldetermination/verification is:</ITAG>(4) Information to be provided by the donor, which shall appear on parts3 through 6 of the form only: Donor name (printed); daytime phone number;date of birth; and certification statement as set forth below, togetherwith a signature block with date which shall be completed by the donor.<ITAG tagnum="21">I certify that I provided my urine specimen to the collector; thatthe specimen bottle was sealed with a tamper-proof seal in my presence;and that the information provided on this form and on the label affixedto the specimen bottle is correct.</ITAG>(5) A statement to the donor which shall appear only on parts 3 and 4 ofthe form, as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Should the results of the laboratory tests for the specimen identifiedby this form be confirmed positive, the Medical Review Officer will contactyou to ask about prescriptions and over-the-counter medications you mayhave taken. Therefore, you may want to make a list of those medicationsas a ``memory jogger.'' THIS LIST IS NOT NECESSARY. If you choose to makea list, do so either on a separate piece of paper or on the back of yourcopy (Copy 4_Donor) of this form_DO NOT LIST ON THE BACK OF ANY OTHER COPYOF THE FORM. TAKE YOUR COPY WITH YOU.</ITAG>A form meeting the requirements of this paragraph is displayed at appendixA to this part.(6) The drug testing custody and control form may include such additionalinformation as may be required for billing or other legitimate purposesnecessary to the collection, provided that personal identifying informationon the donor (other than the social security number) may not be providedto the laboratory. Donor medical information may appear only on the copyprovided to the donor.(b)(1) Use of a clean, single-use specimen bottle that is securely wrappeduntil filled with the specimen. A clean, single-use collection container(e.g., disposable cup or sterile urinal) that is securely wrapped untilused may also be employed. <T3>If urination is directly into the specimen bottle,</T3> the specimenbottle shall be provided to the employee still sealed in its wrapper orshall be unwrapped in the employee's presence immediately prior to itsbeing provided. <T3>If a separate collection container is used for urination,</T3> thecollection container shall be provided to the employee still sealed inits wrapper or shall be unwrapped in the employee's presence immediatelyprior to its being provided; and the collection site person shall unwrapthe specimen bottle in the presence of the employee at the time the urinespecimen is presented.(2) Use of a tamperproof sealing system, designed in a manner such to ensureagainst undetected opening. The specimen bottle shall be identified witha unique identifying number identical to that appearing on the urine custodyand control form, and space shall be provided to initial the bottle affirmingits identity. For purposes of clarity, this part assumes use of a systemmade up of one or more preprinted labels and seals (or a unitary label/seal),but use of other, equally effective technologies is authorized.(c) Use of a shipping container in which the specimen and associated paperworkmay be transferred and which can be sealed and initialled to prevent undetectedtampering. In the split specimen option is exercised, the split specimenand associated paperwork shall be sealed in a shipping (or storage) containerand initialled to prevent undetected tampering.(d) Written procedures, instructions and training shall be provided asfollows:(1) Employer collection procedures and training shall clearly emphasizethat the collection site person is responsible for maintaining the integrityof the specimen collection and transfer process, carefully ensuring themodesty and privacy of the donor, and is to avoid any conduct or remarksthat might be construed as accusatorial or otherwise offensive or inappropriate.(2) A collection site person shall have successfully completed trainingto carry out this function or shall be a licensed medical professionalor technician who is provided instructions for collection under this partand certifies completion as required in this part(i) A non-medical collection site person shall receive training in compliancewith this part and shall demonstrate proficiency in the application ofthis part prior to serving as a collection site person. A medical professional,technologist or technician licensed or otherwise approved to practice inthe jurisdiction in which the collection takes place is not required toreceive such training if that person is provided instructions describedin this part and performs collections in accordance with those instructions.(ii) Collection site persons shall be provided with detailed, clear instructionson the collection of specimens in compliance with this part. Employer representativesand donors subject to testing shall also be provided standard written instructionssetting forth their responsibilities.(3) Unless it is impracticable for any other individual to perform thisfunction, a direct supervisor of an employee shall not serve as the collectionsite person for a test of the employee. If the rules of a DOT agency aremore stringent than this provision regarding the use of supervisors ascollection site personnel, the DOT agency rules shall prevail with respectto testing to which they apply.(4) In any case where a collection is monitored by non-medical personnelor is directly observed, the collection site person shall be of the samegender as the donor. A collection is monitored for this purpose if theenclosure provides less than complete privacy for the donor (e.g., if arestroom stall is used and the collection site person remains in the restroom,or if the collection site person is expected to listen for use of unsecuredsources of water.)<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Specimen collection procedures.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Designation of collection site.</T3> (1) Each employer drug testingprogram shall have one or more designated collection sites which have allnecessary personnel, materials, equipment, facilities and supervision toprovide for the collection, security, temporary storage, and shipping ortransportation of uring specimens to a certified drug testing laboratory.An independent medical facility may also be utilized as a collection siteprovided the other applicable requirements of this part are met.(2) A designated collection site may be any suitable location where a specimencan be collected under conditions set forth in this part, including a properlyequipped mobile facility. A designated collection site shall be a locationhaving an enclosure within which private urination can occur, a toiletfor completion of urination (unless a single-use collector is used withsufficient capacity to contain the void), and a suitable clean surfacefor writing. The site must also have a source of water for washing hands,which, if practicable, should be external to the enclosure where urinationoccurs.(b) <T3>Security.</T3> The purpose of this paragraph is to prevent unauthorizedaccess which could compromise the integrity of the collection process orthe specimen.(1) Procedures shall provide for the designated collection site to be secure.If a collection site facility is dedicated solely to urine collection,it shall be secure at all times. If a facility cannot be dedicated solelyto drug testing, the portion of the facility used for testing shall besecured during drug testing.(2) A facility normally used for other purposes, such as a public restroom or hospital examining room, may be secured by visual inspection toensure other persons are not present and undetected access (e.g., througha rear door not in the view of the collection site person) is not possible.Security during collection may be maintained by effective restriction ofaccess to collection materials and specimens. In the case of a public restroom, the facility must be posted against access during the entire collectionprocedure to avoid embarrassment to the employee or distraction of thecollection site person.(3) If it is impractical to maintain continuous physical security of acollection site from the time the specimen is presented until the sealedmailer is transferred for shipment, the following minimum procedures shallapply. The specimen shall remain under the direct control of the collectionsite person from delivery to its being sealed in the mailer. The mailershall be immediately mailed, maintained in secure storage, or remain untilmailed under the personal control of the collection site person.(c) <T3>Chain of custody.</T3> The chain of custody block of the drug testingcustody and control form shall be properly executed by authorized collectionsite personnel upon receipt of specimens. Handling and transportation ofurine specimens from one authorized individual or place to another shallalways be accomplished through chain of custody procedures. Every effortshall be made to minimize the number of persons handling specimens.(d) <T3>Access to authorized personnel only.</T3> No unauthorized personnelshall be permitted in any part of the designated collection site whereurine specimens are collected or stored. Only the collection site personmay handle specimens prior to their securement in the mailing containeror monitor or observe specimen collection (under the conditions specifiedin this part). In order to promote security of specimens, avoid distractionof the collection site person and ensure against any confusion in the identificationof specimens, the collection site person shall have only one donor underhis or her supervision at any time. For this purpose, a collection procedureis complete when the urine bottle has been sealed and initialled, the drugtesting custody and control form has been executed, and the employee hasdeparted the site (or, in the case of an employee who was unable to providea complete specimen, has entered a waiting area).(e) <T3>Privacy.</T3> (1) Procedures for collecting urine specimens shall allowindividual privacy unless there is a reason to believe that a particularindividual may alter or substitute the specimen to be provided, as furtherdescribed in this paragraph.(2) For purposes of this part, the following circumstances are the exclusivegrounds constituting a reason to believe that the individual may alteror substitute the specimen:(i) The employee has presented a urine specimen that falls outside thenormal temperature range (32.5anddegrees;-37.7 anddegrees;C/90.5anddegrees;-99.8anddegrees;F), and(A) The employee declines to provide a measurement of oral body temperature,as provided in paragraph (f)(14) of the part; or(B) Oral body temperature varies by more than 1anddegrees;C/1.8anddegrees;Ffrom the temperature of the specimen;(ii) The last urine specimen provided by the employee (i.e., on a previousoccasion) was determined by the laboratory to have a specific gravity ofless than 1.003 and a creatinine concentration below .2g/L;(iii) The collection site person observes conduct clearly and unequivocallyindicating an attempt to substitute or adulterate the sample (e.g., substituteurine in plain view, blue dye in specimen presented, etc.); or(iv) The employee has previously been determined to have used a controlledsubstance without medical authorization and the particular test was beingconducted under a DOT agency regulation providing for follow-up testingupon or after return to service.(3) A higher-level supervisor of the collection site person, or a designatedemployer representative, shall review and concur in advance with any decisionby a collection site person to obtain a specimen under the direct observationof a same gender collection site person based upon the circumstances describedin subparagraph (2) of this paragraph.(f) <T3>Integrity and identity of specimen.</T3> Employers shall take precautionsto ensure that a urine specimen is not adulterated or diluted during thecollection procedure and that information on the urine bottle and on theurine custody and control form can identify the individual from whom thespecimen was collected. The following minimum precautions shall be takento ensure that unadulterated specimens are obtained and correctly identified:(1) To deter the dilution of specimens at the collection site, toilet bluingagents shall be placed in toilet tanks wherever possible, so the reservoirof water in the toilet bowl always remains blue. Where practicable, thereshall be no other source of water (e.g., shower or sink) in the enclosurewhere urination occurs. If there is another source of water in the enclosureit shall be effectively secured or monitored to ensure it is not used asa source for diluting the specimen.(2) When an individual arrives at the collection site, the collection siteperson shall ensure that the individual is positively identified as theemployee selected for testing (e.g., through presentation of photo identificationor identification by the employer's representative). If the individual'sidentity cannot be established, the collection site person shall not proceedwith the collection. If the employee requests, the collection site personshall show his/her identification to the employee.(3) If the individual fails to arrive at the assigned time, the collectionsite person shall contact the appropriate authority to obtain guidanceon the action to be taken.(4) The collection site person shall ask the individual to remove any unnecessaryouter garments such as a coat or jacket that might conceal items or substancesthat could be used to tamper with or adulterate the individual's urinespecimen. The collection site person shall ensure that all personal belongingssuch as a purse or briefcase remain with the outer garments. The individualmay retain his or her wallet. If the employee requests it, the collectionsite personnel shall provide the employee a receipt for any personal belongings.(5) The individual shall be instructed to wash and dry his or her handsprior to urination.(6) After washing hands, the individual shall remain in the presence ofthe collection site person and shall not have access to any water fountain,faucet, soap dispenser, cleaning agent or any other materials which couldbe used to adulterate the specimen.(7) The individual may provide his/her specimen in the privacy of a stallor otherwise partitioned area that allows for individual privacy. The collectionsite person shall provide the individual with a specimen bottle or collectioncontainer, if applicable, for this purpose.(8) The collection site person shall note any unusual behavior or appearanceon the urine custody and control form.(9) In the exceptional event that an employer-designated collection siteis not accessible and there is an immediate requirement for specimen collection(e.g., circumstances require a post-accident test), a public rest roommay be used according to the following procedures: A collection site personof the same gender as the individual shall accompany the individual intothe public rest room which shall be made secure during the collection procedure.If possible, a toilet bluing agent shall be placed in the bowl and anyaccessible toilet tank. The collection site person shall remain in therest room, but outside the stall, until the specimen is collected. If nobluing agent is available to deter specimen dilution, the collection siteperson shall instruct the individual not to flush the toilet until thespecimen is delivered to the collection site person. After the collectionsite person has possession of the specimen, the individual will be instructedto flush the toilet and to participate with the collection site personin completing the chain of custody procedures.(10)(i) Upon receiving the specimen from the individual, the collectionsite person shall determine if it contains at least 60 milliliters of urine.If the individual is unable to provide a 60 milliliters of urine, the collectionsite person shall direct the individual to drink fluids and, after a reasonabletime, again attempt to provide a complete sample using a fresh specimenbottle (and fresh collection container, if employed). The original specimenshall be discarded. If the employee is still unable to provide a completespecimen, the following rules apply:(A) In the case of a post-accident test or test for reasonable cause (asdefined by the DOT agency), the employee shall remain at the collectionsite and continue to consume reasonable quantities of fluids until thespecimen has been provided or until the expiration of a period up to 8hours from the beginning of the collection procedure.(B) In the case of a preemployment test, random test, periodic test orother test not for cause (as defined by the DOT agency), the employer mayelect to proceed as specified in paragraph (f)(10)(i)(A) of this section(consistent with any applicable restrictions on hours of service) or mayelect to discontinue the collection and conduct a subsequent collectionat a later time.(C) If the employee cannot provide a complete sample within the up to 8-hourperiod or at the subsequent collection, as applicable, then the employer'sMRO shall refer the individual for a medical evaluation to develop pertinentinformation concerning whether the individual's inability to provide aspecimen is genuine or constitutes a refusal to provide a specimen. (Inpreemployment testing, if the employer does not wish to hire the individual,the MRO is not required to make such a referral.) Upon completion of theexamination, the MRO shall report his or her conclusions to the employerin writing.(ii) The employer may, but is not required to, use a ``split sample'' methodof collection.(A) The donor shall urinate into a collection container, which the collectionsite person, in the presence of the donor, after determining specimen temperature,pours into two specimen bottles.(B) The first bottle is to be used for the DOT-mandated test, and 60 mlof urine shall be poured into it. If there is no additional urine availablefor the second specimen bottle, the first specimen bottle shall neverthelessbe processed for testing.(C) Up to 60 ml of the remainder of the urine shall be poured into thesecond specimen bottle.(D) All requirements of this part shall be followed with respect to bothsamples, including the requirement that a copy of the chain of custodyform accompany each bottle processed under ``split sample'' procedures.(E) Any specimen collected under ``split sample'' procedures must be storedin a secured, refrigerated environment and an appropriate entry made inthe chain of custody form.(F) If the test of the first bottle is positive, the employee may requestthat the MRO direct that the second bottle be tested in a DHHS-certifiedlaboratory for presence of the drug(s) for which a positive result wasobtained in the test of the first bottle. The result of this test is transmittedto the MRO without regard to the cutoff values of andSection; 40.29. TheMRO shall honor such a request if it is made within 72 hours of the employee'shaving actual notice that he or she tested positive.(G) Action required by DOT regulations as the result of a positive drugtest (e.g., removal from performing a safety-sensitive function) is notstayed pending the result of the second test.(H) If the result of the second test is negative, the MRO shall cancelthe test.(11) After the specimen has been provided and submitted to the collectionsite person, the individual shall be allowed to wash his or her hands.(12) Immediately after the specimen is collected, the collection site personshall measure the temperature of the specimen. The temperature measuringdevice used must accurately reflect the temperature of the specimen andnot contaminate the specimen. The time from urination to temperature measureis critical and in no case shall exceed 4 minutes.(13) A specimen temperature outside the range of 32.5anddegrees;-37.7 anddegrees;C/90.5anddegrees;-99.8anddegrees;F constitutes a reason to believe that the individual has alteredor substituted the specimen (see paragraph (e)(2)(i) of this section).In such cases, the individual supplying the specimen may volunteer to havehis or her oral temperature taken to provide evidence to counter the reasonto believe the individual may have altered or substituted the specimen.(14) Immediately after the specimen is collected, the collection site personshall also inspect the specimen to determine its color and look for anysigns of contaminants. Any unusual findings shall be noted on the urinecustody and control form.(15) All specimens suspected of being adulterated shall be forwarded tothe laboratory for testing.(16) Whenever there is reason to believe that a particular individual hasaltered or substituted the specimen as described in paragraph (e)(2) (i)or (iii) of this section, a second specimen shall be obtained as soon aspossible under the direct observation of a same gender collection siteperson.(17) Both the individual being tested and the collection site person shallkeep the specimen in view at all times prior to its being sealed and labeled.As provided below, the specimen shall be sealed (by placement of a tamperproofseal over the bottle cap and down the sides of the bottle) and labeledin the presence of the employee. If the specimen is transferred to a secondbottle, the collection site person shall request the individual to observethe transfer of the specimen and the placement of the tamperproof sealover the bottle cap and down the sides of the bottle.(18) The collection site person and the individual being tested shall bepresent at the same time during procedures outlined in paragraphs (f)(19)-(f)(22)of this section.(19) The collection site person shall place securely on the bottle an identificationlabel which contains the date, the individual's specimen number, and anyother identifying information provided or required by the employer. Ifseparate from the label, the tamperproof seal shall also be applied.(20) The individual shall initial the identification label on the specimenbottle for the purpose of certifying that it is the specimen collectedfrom him or her.(21) The collection site person shall enter on the drug testing custodyand control form all information identifying the specimen. The collectionsite person shall sign the drug testing custody and control form certifyingthat the collection was accomplished according to the applicable Federalrequirements.(22)(i) The individual shall be asked to read and sign a statement on thedrug testing custody and control form certifying that the specimen identifiedas having been collected from him or her is in fact the specimen he orshe provided.(ii) When specified by DOT agency regulation or required by the collectionsite (other than an employer site) or by the laboratory, the employee maybe required to sign a consent or release form authorizing the collectionof the specimen, analysis of the specimen for designated controlled substances,and release of the results to the employer. The employee may not be requiredto waive liability with respect to negligence on the part of any personparticipating in the collection, handling or analysis of the specimen orto indemnify any person for the negligence of others.(23) The collection site person shall complete the chain of custody portionof the drug testing custody and control form to indicate receipt of thespecimen from the employee and shall certify proper completion of the collection.(24) The urine specimen and chain of custody form are now ready for shipment.If the specimen is not immediately prepared for shipment, the collectionsite person shall ensure that it is appropriately safeguarded during temporarystorage.(25)(i) While any part of the above chain of custody procedures is beingperformed, it is essential that the urine specimen and custody documentsbe under the control of the involved collection site person. If the involvedcollection site person leaves his or her work station momentarily, thecollection site person shall take the specimen and drug testing custodyand control form with him or her or shall secure them. After the collectionsite person returns to the work station, the custody process will continue.If the collection site person is leaving for an extended period of time,he or she shall package the specimen for mailing before leaving the site.(ii) The collection site person shall not leave the collection site inthe interval between presentation of the specimen by the employee and securementof the sample with an identifying label bearing the employee's specimenidentification number (shown on the urine custody and control form) andseal initialed by the employee. If it becomes necessary for the collectionsite person to leave the site during this interval, the collection shallbe nullified and (at the election of the employer) a new collection begun.(g) <T3>Collection control.</T3> To the maximum extent possible, collectionsite personnel shall keep the individual's specimen bottle within sightboth before and after the individual has urinated. After the specimen iscollected, it shall be properly sealed and labeled.(h) <T3>Transportation to laboratory.</T3> Collection site personnel shallarrange to ship the collected specimen to the drug testing laboratory.The specimens shall be placed in shipping containers designed to minimizethe possibility of damage during shipment (e.g., specimen boxes and/orpadded mailers); and those containers shall be securely sealed to eliminatethe possibility of undetected tampering. On the tape sealing the container,the collection site person shall sign and enter the date specimens weresealed in the shipping containers for shipment. The collection site personshall ensure that the chain of custody documentation is attached or enclosedin each container sealed for shipment to the drug testing laboratory.(i) <T3>Failure to cooperate.</T3> If the employee refuses to cooperate withthe collection process, the collection site person shall inform the employerrepresentative and shall document the non-cooperation on the drug testingcustody and control form.(j) <T3>Employee requiring medical attention.</T3> If the sample is being collectedfrom an employee in need of medical attention (e.g., as part of a post-accidenttest given in an emergency medical facility), necessary medical attentionshall not be delayed in order to collect the specimen.(k)<T3> Use of chain of custody forms.</T3> A chain of custody form (and alaboratory internal chain of custody document, where applicable) shallbe used for maintaining control and accountability of each specimen fromthe point of collection to final disposition of the specimen. The dateand purpose shall be documented on the form each time a specimen is handledor transferred and every individual in the chain shall be identified. Everyeffort shall be made to minimize the number of persons handling specimens.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.27 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Laboratory personnel.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Day-to-day management.</T3> (1) The laboratory shall have a qualifiedindividual to assume professional, organizational, educational, and administrativeresponsibility for the laboratory's urine drug testing facility.(2) This individual shall have documented scientific qualifications inanalytical forensic toxicology. Minimum qualifications are:(i) Certification as a laboratory director by a State in forensic or clinicallaboratory toxicology; or(ii) A Ph.D. in one of the natural sciences with an adequate undergraduateand graduate education in biology, chemistry, and pharmacology or toxicology;or(iii) Training and experience comparable to a Ph.D. in one of the naturalsciences, such as a medical or scientific degree with additional trainingand laboratory/research experience in biology, chemistry, and pharmacologyor toxicology; and(iv) In addition to the requirements in paragraph (a)(2) (i), (ii), or(iii) of this section, minimum qualifications also require:(A) Appropriate experience in analytical forensic toxicology includingexperience with the analysis of biological material for drugs of abuse,and(B) Appropriate training and/or experience in forensic applications ofanalytical toxicology, e.g., publications, court testimony, research concerninganalytical toxicology of drugs of abuse, or other factors which qualifythe individual as an expert witness in forensic toxicology.(3) This individual shall be engaged in and responsible for the day-to-daymanagement of the drug testing laboratory even where another individualhas overall responsibility for an entire multi-specialty laboratory.(4) This individual shall be responsible for ensuring that there are enoughpersonnel with adequate training and experience to supervise and conductthe work of the drug testing laboratory. He or she shall assure the continuedcompetency of laboratory personnel by documenting their in-service training,reviewing their work performance, and verifying their skills.(5) This individual shall be responsible for the laboratory's having aprocedure manual which is complete, up-to-date, available for personnelperforming tests, and followed by those personnel. The procedure manualshall be reviewed, signed, and dated by this responsible individual wheneverprocedures are first placed into use or changed or when a new individualassumes responsibility for management of the drug testing laboratory. Copiesof all procedures and dates on which they are in effect shall be maintained.(Specific contents of the procedure manual are described in andSection; 40.29(n)(1).)(6) This individual shall be responsible for maintaining a quality assuranceprogram to assure the proper performance and reporting of all test results;for maintaining acceptable analytical performance for all controls andstandards; for maintaining quality control testing; and for assuring anddocumenting the validity, reliability, accuracy, precision, and performancecharacteristics of each test and test system.(7) This individual shall be responsible for taking all remedial actionsnecessary to maintain satisfactory operation and performance of the laboratoryin response to quality control systems not being within performance specifications,errors in result reporting or in analysis of performance testing results.This individual shall ensure that sample results are not reported untilall corrective actions have been taken and he or she can assure that thetests results provided are accurate and reliable.(b) <T3>Test validation.</T3> The laboratory's urine drug testing facilityshall have a qualified individual(s) who reviews all pertinent data andquality control results in order to attest to the validity of the laboratory'stest reports. A laboratory may designate more than one person to performthis function. This individual(s) may be any employee who is qualifiedto be responsible for day-to-day management or operation of the drug testinglaboratory.(c) <T3>Day-to-day operations and supervision of analysts.</T3> The laboratory'surine drug testing facility shall have an individual to be responsiblefor day-to-day operations and to supervise the technical analysts. Thisindividual(s) shall have at least a bachelor's degree in the chemical orbiological sciences or medical technology or equivalent. He or she shallhave training and experience in the theory and practice of the proceduresused in the laboratory, resulting in his or her thorough understandingof quality control practices and procedures; the review, interpretation,and reporting of test results; maintenance of chain of custody; and properremedial actions to be taken in response to test systems being out of controllimits or detecting aberrant test or quality control results.(d) <T3>Other personnel.</T3> Other technicians or nontechnical staff shallhave the necessary training and skills for the tasks assigned.(e) <T3>Training.</T3> The laboratory's urine drug testing program shall makeavailable continuing education programs to meet the needs of laboratorypersonnel.(f) <T3>Files.</T3> Laboratory personnel files shall include: resume of trainingand experience, certification or license if any; references; job descriptions;records of performance evaluation and advancement; incident reports; andresults of tests which establish employee competency for the position heor she holds, such as a test for color blindness, if appropriate.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.29</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Laboratory analysis procedures.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Security and chain of custody.</T3> (1) Drug testing laboratories shallbe secure at all times. They shall have in place sufficient security measuresto control access to the premises and to ensure that no unauthorized personnelhandle specimens or gain access to the laboratory process or to areas whererecords are stored. Access to these secured areas shall be limited to specificallyauthorized individuals whose authorization is documented. With the exceptionof personnel authorized to conduct inspections on behalf of Federal agenciesfor which the laboratory is engaged in urine testing or on behalf of DHHS,all authorized visitors and maintenance and service personnel shall beescorted at all times. Documentation of individuals accessing these areas,dates, and time of entry and purpose of entry must be maintained.(2) Laboratories shall use chain of custody procedures to maintain controland accountability of specimens from receipt through completion of testing,reporting of results during storage, and continuing until final dispositionof specimens. The date and purpose shall be documented on an appropriatechain of custody form each time a specimen is handled or transferred andevery individual in the chain shall be identified. Accordingly, authorizedtechnicians shall be responsible for each urine specimen or aliquot intheir possession and shall sign and complete chain of custody forms forthose specimens or aliquots as they are received.(b) <T3>Receiving.</T3> (1) When a shipment of specimens is received, laboratorypersonnel shall inspect each package for evidence of possible tamperingand compare information on specimen bottles within each package to theinformation on the accompanying chain of custody forms. Any direct evidenceof tampering or discrepancies in the information on specimen bottles andthe employer's chain of custody forms attached to the shipment shall beimmediately reported to the employer and shall be noted on the laboratory'schain of custody form which shall accompany the specimens while they arein the laboratory's possession.(2) Specimen bottles generally shall be retained within the laboratory'saccession area until all analyses have been completed. Aliquots and thelaboratory's chain of custody forms shall be used by laboratory personnelfor conducting initial and confirmatory tests.(c) <T3>Short-term refrigerated storage.</T3> Specimens that do not receivean initial test within 7 days of arrival at the laboratory shall be placedin secure refrigeration units. Temperatures shall not exceed 6anddegrees;C.Emergency power equipment shall be available in case of prolonged powerfailure.(d) <T3>Specimen processing.</T3> Laboratory facilities for urine drug testingwill normally process specimens by grouping them into batches. The numberof specimens in each batch may vary significantly depending on the sizeof the laboratory and its workload. When conducting either initial or confirmatorytests, every batch shall contain an appropriate number of standards forcalibrating the instrumentation and a minimum of 10 percent controls. Bothquality control and blind performance test samples shall appear as ordinarysamples to laboratory analysts.(e) <T3>Initial test.</T3> (1) The initial test shall use an immunoassay whichmeets the requirements of the Food and Drug Administration for commercialdistribution. The following initial cutoff levels shall be used when screeningspecimens to determine whether they are negative for these five drugs orclasses of drugs:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s20,14</C> <H1> </H1><H1>Initial test cutoff levels (ng/ml)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Marijuana metabolites<D>100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cocaine metabolites<D>300</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Opiate metabolites<D>*300</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Phencyclidine<D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Amphetamines<D>1,000</D><F>*25 ng/ml if immunoassay specific for free morphine.</F></ITAG></ITAG>(2) These cutoff levels are subject to change by the Department of Healthand Human Services as advances in technology or other considerations warrantidentification of these substances at other concentrations.(f) <T3>Confirmatory test.</T3> (1) All specimens identified as positive onthe initial test shall be confirmed using gas chromatography/mass spectrometry(GC/MS) techniques at the cutoff levels listed in this paragraph for eachdrug. All confirmations shall be by quantitative analysis. Concentrationsthat exceed the linear region of the standard curve shall be documentedin the laboratory record as ``greater than highest standard curve value.''<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s20,14</C> <H1> </H1><H1>Confirmatory test cutoff levels (ng/ml)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Marijuana metabolite\1\<D>15</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cocaine metabolite\2\<D>150</D></ITAG>Opiates:<ITAG tagnum="3">Morphine</ITAG><D>300</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Codeine</ITAG><D>300</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Phencyclidine<D>25</D></ITAG>Amphetamines:<ITAG tagnum="3">Amphetamine</ITAG><D>500</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Methamphetamine</ITAG><D>500</D><F>\1\ Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol-9-carboxylic acid.</F><F>\2\ Benzoylecgonine.</F></ITAG>(2) These cutoff levels are subject to change by the Department of Healthand Human Services as advances in technology or other considerations warrantidentification of these substances at other concentrations.(g) <T3>Reporting results.</T3> (1) The laboratory shall report test resultsto the employer's Medical Review Officer within an average of 5 workingdays after receipt of the specimen by the laboratory. Before any test resultis reported (the results of initial tests, confirmatory tests, or qualitycontrol data), it shall be reviewed and the test certified as an accuratereport by the responsible individual. The report shall identify the drugs/metabolitestested for, whether positive or negative, the specimen number assignedby the employer, and the drug testing laboratory specimen identificationnumber (accession number).  (2) The laboratory shall report as negative all specimens that are negativeon the initial test or negative on the confirmatory test. Only specimensconfirmed positive shall be reported positive for a specific drug.  (3) The Medical Review Officer may request from the laboratory and thelaboratory shall provide quantitation of test results. The MRO shall reportwhether the test is positive or negative, and may report the drug(s) forwhich there was a positive test, but shall not disclose the quantitationof test results to the employer. <T3>Provided, </T3>that the MRO may reveal the quantitation of a positivetest result to the employer, the employee, or the decisionmaker in a lawsuit,grievance, or other proceeding initiated by or on behalf of the employeeand arising from a verified positive drug test.  (4) The laboratory may transmit results to the Medical Review Officer byvarious electronic means (for example, teleprinters, facsimile, or computer)in a manner designed to ensure confidentiality of the information. Resultsmay not be provided verbally by telephone. The laboratory and employermust ensure the security of the data transmission and limit access to anydata transmission, storage, and retrieval system.(5) The laboratory shall send only to the Medical Review Officer the originalor a certified true copy of the drug testing custody and control form (part2), which, in the case of a report positive for drug use, shall be signed(after the required certification block) by the individual responsiblefor day-to-day management of the drug testing laboratory or the individualresponsible for attesting to the validity of the test reports, and attachedto which shall be a copy of the test report.(6) The laboratory shall provide to the employer official responsible forcoordination of the drug testing program a monthly statistical summaryof urinalysis testing of the employer's employees and shall not includein the summary any personal identifying information. Initial and confirmationdata shall be included from test results reported within that month. Normallythis summary shall be forwarded by registered or certified mail not morethan 14 calendar days after the end of the month covered by the summary.The summary shall contain the following information:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Initial Testing;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Number of specimens received;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Number of specimens reported out; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Number of specimens screened positive for:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Marijuana metabolites</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Cocaine metabolites</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Opiate metabolites</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Phencyclidine</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Amphetamine</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Confirmatory Testing:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Number of specimens received for confirmation;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Number of specimens confirmed positive for:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Marijuana metabolite</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Cocaine metabolite</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Morphine, codeine </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Phencyclidine</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Amphetamine</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Methamphetamine</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Monthly reports shall not include data from which it is reasonablylikely that information about individuals' tests can be readily inferred.If necessary, in order to prevent the disclosure of such data, the laboratoryshall not send a report until data are sufficiently aggregated to makesuch an inference unlikely. In any month in which a report is withheldfor this reason, the laboratory will so inform the employer in writing.(7) The laboratory shall make available copies of all analytical resultsfor employer drug testing programs when requested by DOT or any DOT agencywith regulatory authority over the employer.(8) Unless otherwise instructed by the employer in writing, all recordspertaining to a given urine specimen shall be retained by the drug testinglaboratory for a minimum of 2 years.(h) <T3>Long-term storage.</T3> Long-term frozen storage (^20anddegrees;C orless) ensures that positive urine specimens will be available for any necessaryretest during administrative or disciplinary proceedings. Drug testinglaboratories shall retain and place in properly secured long-term frozenstorage for a minimum of 1 year all specimens confirmed positive, in theiroriginal labeled specimen bottles. Within this 1-year period, an employer(or other person designated in a DOT agency regulation) may request thelaboratory to retain the specimen for an additional period of time, butif no such request is received the laboratory may discard the specimenafter the end of 1 year, except that the laboratory shall be required tomaintain any specimens known to be under legal challenge for an indefiniteperiod.(i) <T3>Retesting specimens.</T3> Because some analytes deteriorate or arelost during freezing and/or storage, quantitation for a retest is not subjectto a specific cutoff requirement but must provide data sufficient to confirmthe presence of the drug or metabolite.(j) <T3>Subcontracting.</T3> Drug testing laboratories shall not subcontractand shall perform all work with their own personnel and equipment. Thelaboratory must be capable of performing testing for the five classes ofdrugs (marijuana, cocaine, opiates, phencyclidine and amphetamines) usingthe initial immunoassay and confirmatory GC/MS methods specified in thispart. This paragraph does not prohibit subcontracting of laboratory analysisif specimens are sent directly from the collection site to the subcontractor,the subcontractor is a laboratory certified by DHHS as required in thispart, the subcontractor performs all analysis and provides storage requiredunder this part, and the subcontractor is responsible to the employer forcompliance with this part and applicable DOT agency regulations as if itwere the prime contractor.(k) <T3>Laboratory facilities.</T3> (1) Laboratory facilities shall complywith applicable provisions of any State licensing requirements.(2) Laboratories certified in accordance with DHHS Guidelines shall havethe capability, at the same laboratory premises, of performing initialand confirmatory tests for each drug or metabolite for which service isoffered.(l) <T3>Inspections.</T3> The Secretary, a DOT agency, any employer utilizingthe laboratory, DHHS or any organization performing laboratory certificationon behalf of DHHS reserves the right to inspect the laboratory at any time.Employer contracts with laboratories for drug testing, as well as contractsfor collection site services, shall permit the employer and the DOT agencyof jurisdiction (directly or through an agent) to conduct unannounced inspections.(m) <T3>Documentation.</T3> The drug testing laboratories shall maintain andmake available for at least 2 years documentation of all aspects of thetesting process. This 2 year period may be extended upon written notificationby a DOT agency or by any employer for which laboratory services are beingprovided. The required documentation shall include personnel files on allindividuals authorized to have access to specimens; chain of custody documents;quality assurance/quality control records; procedure manuals; all testdata (including calibration curves and any calculations used in determiningtest results); reports; performance records on performance testing; performanceon certification inspections; and hard copies of computer-generated data.The laboratory shall maintain documents for any specimen known to be underlegal challenge for an indefinite period.(n) <T3>Additional requirements for certified laboratories.</T3>_(1) <T3>Procedure manual.</T3> Each laboratory shall have a procedure manualwhich includes the principles of each test preparation of reagents, standardsand controls, calibration procedures, derivation of results, linearityof methods, sensitivity of methods, cutoff values, mechanisms for reportingresults, controls criteria for unacceptable specimens and results, remedialactions to be taken when the test systems are outside of acceptable limits,reagents and expiration dates, and references. Copies of all proceduresand dates on which they are in effect shall be maintained as part of themanual.(2) <T3>Standards and controls.</T3> Laboratory standards shall be preparedwith pure drug standards which are properly labeled as to content and concentration.The standards shall be labeled with the following dates: when received;when prepared or opened; when placed in service; and expiration date.(3) <T3>Instruments and equipment.</T3> (i) Volumetric pipettes and measuringdevices shall be certified for accuracy or be checked by gravimetric, colorimetric,or other verification procedure. Automatic pipettes and dilutors shallbe checked for accuracy and reproducibility before being placed in serviceand checked periodically thereafter.(ii) There shall be written procedures for instrument set-up and normaloperation, a schedule for checking critical operating characteristics forall instruments, tolerance limits for acceptable function checks and instructionsfor major trouble shooting and repair. Records shall be available on preventivemaintenance.(4) <T3>Remedial actions.</T3> There shall be written procedures for the actionsto be taken when systems are out of acceptable limits or errors are detected.There shall be documentation that these procedures are followed and thatall necessary corrective actions are taken. There shall also be in placesystems to verify all stages of testing and reporting and documentationthat these procedures are followed.(5) <T3>Personnel available to testify at proceedings.</T3> A laboratory shallhave qualified personnel available to testify in an administrative or disciplinaryproceeding against an employee when that proceeding is based on positiveurinalysis results reported by the laboratory.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Quality assurance and quality control.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Drug testing laboratories shall have a quality assuranceprogram which encompasses all aspects of the testing process includingbut not limited to specimen acquisition, chain of custody security andreporting of results, initial and confirmatory testing and validation ofanalytical procedures. Quality assurance procedures shall be designed,implemented and reviewed to monitor the conduct of each step of the processof testing for drugs.(b) <T3>Laboratory quality control requirements for initial tests.</T3> Eachanalytical run of specimens to be screened shall include:(1) Urine specimens certified to contain no drug;(2) Urine specimens fortified with known standards; and(3) Positive controls with the drug or metabolite at or near the cutofflevel.In addition, with each batch of samples a sufficient number of standardsshall be included to ensure and document the linearity of the assay methodover time in the concentration area of the cutoff. After acceptable valuesare obtained for the known standards, those values will be used to calculatesample data. Implementation of procedures to ensure the carryover doesnot contaminate the testing of an individual's specimen shall be documented.A minimum of 10 percent of all test samples shall be quality control specimens.Laboratory quality control samples, prepared from spiked urine samplesof determined concentration shall be included in the run and should appearas normal samples to laboratory analysts. One percent of each run, witha minimum of at least one sample, shall be the laboratory's own qualitycontrol samples.(c) <T3>Laboratory quality control requirements for confirmation tests.</T3>Each analytical run of specimens to be confirmed shall include:(1) Urine specimens certified to contain no drug;(2) Urine specimens fortified with known standards; and(3) Positive controls with the drug or metabolite at or near the cutofflevel. The linearity and precision of the method shall be periodicallydocumented. Implementation of procedures to ensure that carryover doesnot contaminate the testing of an individual's specimen shall also be documented.(d) <T3>Employer blind performance test procedures.</T3>(1) Each employer covered by DOT agency drug testing regulations shalluse blind testing quality control procedures as provided in this paragraph.(2) Each employer shall submit three blind performance test specimens foreach 100 employee specimens it submits, up to a maximum of 100 blind performancetest specimens submitted per quarter. A DOT agency may increase this perquarter maximum number of samples if doing so is necessary to ensure adequatequality control of employers or consortiums with very large numbers ofemployees.(3) For employers with 2000 or more covered employees, approximately 80percent of the blind performance test samples shall be blank (i.e., containingno drug or otherwise as approved by a DOT agency) and the remaining samplesshall be positive for one or more drugs per sample in a distribution suchthat all the drugs to be tested are included in approximately equal frequenciesof challenge. The positive samples shall be spiked only with those drugsfor which the employer is testing. This paragraph shall not be construedto prohibit spiking of other (potentially interfering) compounds, as technicallyappropriate, in order to verify the specificity of a particular assay.(4) Employers with fewer than 2000 covered employees may submit blind performancetest specimens as provided in paragraph (d)(3) of this section. Such employersmay also submit only blank samples or may submit two separately labeledportions of a specimen from the same non-covered employee.(5) Consortiums shall be responsible for the submission of blind sampleson behalf of their members. The blind sampling rate shall apply to thetotal number of samples submitted by the consortium.(6) The DOT agency concerned shall investigate, or shall refer to DHHSfor investigation, any unsatisfactory performance testing result and, basedon this investigation, the laboratory shall take action to correct thecause of the unsatisfactory performance test result. A record shall bemade of the investigative findings and the corrective action taken by thelaboratory, and that record shall be dated and signed by the individualresponsible for the day-to-day management and operation of the drug testinglaboratory. Then the DOT agency shall send the document to the employeras a report of the unsatisfactory performance testing incident. The DOTagency shall ensure notification of the finding to DHHS.(7) Should a false positive error occur on a blind performance test specimenand the error is determined to be an administrative error (clerical, samplemixup, etc.), the employer shall promptly notify the DOT agency concerned.The DOT agency and the employer shall require the laboratory to take correctiveaction to minimize the occurrence of the particular error in the future,and, if there is reason to believe the error could have been systemic,the DOT agency may also require review and reanalysis of previously runspecimens.(8) Should a false positive error occur on a blind performance test specimenand the error is determined to be a technical or methodological error,the employer shall instruct the laboratory to submit all quality controldata from the batch of specimens which included the false positive specimento the DOT agency concerned. In addition, the laboratory shall retest allspecimens analyzed positive for that drug or metabolite from the time offinal resolution of the error back to the time of the last satisfactoryperformance test cycle. This retesting shall be documented by a statementsigned by the individual responsible for day-to-day management of the laboratory'surine drug testing. The DOT agency concerned may require an on-site reviewof the laboratory which may be conducted unannounced during any hours ofoperation of the laboratory. Based on information provided by the DOT agency,DHHS has the option of revoking or suspending the laboratory's certificationor recommending that no further action be taken if the case is one of lessserious error in which corrective action has already been taken, thus reasonablyassuring that the error will not occur again.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.33</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Reporting and review of results.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Medical review officer shall review confirmed positive results.</T3>(1) An essential part of the drug testing program is the final review ofconfirmed positive results from the laboratory. A positive test resultdoes not automatically identify an employee/applicant as having used drugsin violation of a DOT agency regulation. An individual with a detailedknowledge of possible alternate medical explanations is essential to thereview of results. This review shall be performed by the Medical ReviewOfficer (MRO) prior to the transmission of the results to employer administrativeofficials. The MRO review shall include review of the chain of custodyto ensure that it is complete and sufficient on its face.(2) The duties of the MRO with respect to negative results are purely administrative.(b) <T3>Medical review officer_qualifications and responsibilities.</T3> (1)The MRO shall be a licensed physician with knowledge of substance abusedisorders and may be an employee of a transportation employer or a privatephysician retained for this purpose.(2) The MRO shall not be an employee of the laboratory conducting the drugtest unless the laboratory establishes a clear separation of functionsto prevent any appearance of a conflict of interest, including assuringthat the MRO has no responsibility for, and is not supervised by or thesupervisor of, any persons who have responsibility for the drug testingor quality control operations of the laboratory.(3) The role of the MRO is to review and interpret confirmed positive testresults obtained through the employer's testing program. In carrying outthis responsibility, the MRO shall examine alternate medical explanationsfor any positive test result. This action may include conducting a medicalinterview and review of the individual's medical history, or review ofany other relevant biomedical factors. The MRO shall review all medicalrecords made available by the tested individual when a confirmed positivetest could have resulted from legally prescribed medication. The MRO shallnot, however, consider the results or urine samples that are not obtainedor processed in accordance with this part.(c) <T3>Positive test result.</T3> (1) Prior to making a final decision toverify a positive test result for an individual, the MRO shall give theindividual an opportunity to discuss the test result with him or her.(2) The MRO shall contact the individual directly, on a confidential basis,to determine whether the employee wishes to discuss the test result. Astaff person under the MRO's supervision may make the initial contact,and a medically licensed or certified staff person may gather informationfrom the employee. Except as provided in paragraph (c)(5) of this section,the MRO shall talk directly with the employee before verifying a test aspositive.(3) If, after making all reasonable efforts and documenting them, the MROis unable to reach the individual directly, the MRO shall contact a designatedmanagement official who shall direct the individual to contact the MROas soon as possible. If it becomes necessary to reach the individual throughthe designated management official, the designated management officialshall employ procedures that ensure, to the maximum extent practicable,the requirement that the employee contact the MRO is held in confidence.(4) If, after making all reasonable efforts, the designated managementofficial is unable to contact the employee, the employer may place theemployee on temporary medically unqualified status or medical leave.(5) The MRO may verify a test as positive without having communicated directlywith the employee about the test in three circumstances:(i) The employee expressly declines the opportunity to discuss the test;(ii) The designated employer representative has successfully made and documenteda contact with the employee and instructed the employee to contact theMRO (see paragraphs (c) (3) and (4) of this section), and more than fivedays have passed since the date the employee was successfully contactedby the designated employer representative; or(iii) Other circumstances provided for in DOT agency drug testing regulations.(6) If a test is verified positive under the circumstances specified inparagraph (c)(5)(ii) of this section, the employee may present to the MROinformation documenting that serious illness, injury, or other circumstancesunavoidably prevented the employee from timely contacting the MRO. TheMRO, on the basis of such information, may reopen the verification, allowingthe employee to present information concerning a legitimate explanationfor the confirmed positive test. If the MRO concludes that there is a legitimateexplanation, the MRO declares the test to be negative.(7) Following verification of a positive test result, the MRO shall, asprovided in the employer's policy, refer the case to the employer's employeeassistance or rehabilitation program, if applicable, to the managementofficial empowered to recommend or take administrative action (or the official'sdesignated agent), or both.(d) <T3>Verification for opiates; review for prescription medication.</T3>Before the MRO verifies a confirmed positive result for opiates, he orshe shall determine that there is clinical evidence_in addition to theurine test_of unauthorized use of any opium, opiate, or opium derivative(e.g., morphine/codeine). (This requirement does not apply if the employer'sGC/MS confirmation testing for opiates confirms the presence of 6-monoacetylmorphine.)(e) <T3>Reanalysis authorized.</T3> Should any question arise as to the accuracyor validity of a positive test result, only the Medical Review Officeris authorized to order a reanalysis of the original sample and such retestsare authorized only at laboratories certified by DHHS. The Medical ReviewOfficer shall authorize a reanalysis of the original sample if requestedto do so by the employee within 72 hours of the employee's having receivedactual notice of the positive test. If the retest is negative, the MROshall cancel the test.(f) <T3>Result consistent with legal drug use.</T3> If the MRO determines thereis a legitimate medical explanation for the positive test result, the MROshall report the test result to the employer as negative.(g) <T3>Result scientifically insufficient.</T3> Additionally, the MRO, basedon review of inspection reports, quality control data, multiple samples,and other pertinent results, may determine that the result is scientificallyinsufficient for further action and declare the test specimen negative.In this situation the MRO may request reanalysis of the original samplebefore making this decision. (The MRO may request that reanalysis as providedin andSection; 40.33(e) be performed by the same laboratory or, that an aliquotof the original specimen be sent for reanalysis to an alternate laboratorywhich is certified in accordance with the DHHS Guidelines.) The laboratoryshall assist in this review process as requested by the MRO by making availablethe individual responsible for day-to-day management of the urine drugtesting laboratory or other employee who is a forensic toxicologist orwho has equivalent forensic experience in urine drug testing, to providespecific consultation as required by the employer. The employer shall includein any required annual report to a DOT agency a summary of any negativefindings based on scientific insufficiency but shall not include any personalidentifying information in such reports.(h) <T3>Disclosure of information.</T3> Except as provided in this paragraph,the MRO shall not disclose to any third party medical information providedby the individual to the MRO as a part of the testing verification process.(1) The MRO may disclose such information to the employer, a DOT agencyor other Federal safety agency, or a physician responsible for determiningthe medical qualification of the employee under an applicable DOT agencyregulation, as applicable, only if_(i) An applicable DOT regulation permits or requires such disclosure;(ii) In the MRO's reasonable medical judgment, the information could resultin the employee being determined to be medically unqualified under an applicableDOT agency rule; or(iii) In the MRO's reasonable medical judgment, in a situation in whichthere is no DOT agency rule establishing physical qualification standardsapplicable to the employee, the information indicates that continued performanceby the employee of his or her safety-sensitive function could pose a significantsafety risk.(2) Before obtaining medical information from the employee as part of theverification process, the MRO shall inform the employee that informationmay be disclosed to third parties as provided in this paragraph and theidentity of any parties to whom information may be disclosed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.35 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Protection of employee records.</ITAG>Employer contracts with laboratories shall require that the laboratorymaintain employee test records in confidence, as provided in DOT agencyregulations. The contracts shall provide that the laboratory shall discloseinformation related to a positive drug test of an individual to the individual,the employer, or the decisionmaker in a lawsuit, grievance, or other proceedinginitiated by or on behalf of the individual and arising from a certifiedpositive drug test.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.37 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Individual access to test and laboratory certification results.</ITAG>Any employee who is the subject of a drug test conducted under this partshall, upon wirtten request, have access to any records relating to hisor her drug test and any records relating to the results of any relevantcertification, review, or revocation-of-certification proceedings.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 40.39 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Use of DHHS_certified laboratories.</ITAG>Employers subject to this part shall use only laboratories certified underthe DHHS ``Mandatory Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs,''53 FR 11970, April 11, 1988, and subsequent amendments thereto.<ITAG tagnum="84">APPENDIX A_DRUG TESTING CUSTODY AND CONTROL FORM</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-62-M007</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-28061 Filed 11-28-89; 10:27 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-62-C</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>